   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate
   alternate alternate alternate

   Skip to main content
     * Why Mailchimp?
     * Marketing Platform
          + Illustration of stars and planets Overview
            All the tools you need to market smarter and grow faster.
          + Illustration of a finger tip puppet Audience
               o Marketing CRM
               o Audience Dashboard
               o Tags
               o Segmentation
               o Lookalike Audiences
               o Address Finder
          + Brand
               o Content Studio
               o Templates
          + Layered squares stacked Campaigns
               o Email
               o Social Media
               o Landing Pages
               o Digital Ads
               o Postcards
               o Automations
          + Illustration of a magnifying glass Insights
               o Reports & Analytics
               o Smart Recommendations
               o Integrations
     * Pricing
     * Resources
          + Overview
          + Mailchimp 101
            Everything you need to get started
          + Marketing Tips
            Learn how to master marketing
          + Guides & Tutorials
            Get step-by-step help with Mailchimp
          + MCP - Illustration Mailchimp Presents
            Entertainment made for entrepreneurs

     *
     * Search ____________________ (BUTTON)
     *
     * Log In
     * Sign Up Free
     * Log In
     * Sign Up Free
     *
          + Audience
          + Dashboard
          + Campaigns
          + Reports
          + Account
          + Log In

   (BUTTON)

Legal

   Thanks for taking the time to learn about Mailchimp's legal policies.
   It's important stuff. This is where you'll find information about how
   we protect your privacy, what you can and can't do with Mailchimp, and
   how we handle user accounts.
   Contact Legal

Standard Terms of Use

   The main agreement you're making in order to use Mailchimp
   Learn more
   An illustration of a eye looking through a magnifying glass

Additional Terms

   Some Mailchimp products are subject to additional usage terms and
   restrictions
   Learn more

Acceptable Use

   A set of rules about the types of content you can send through
   Mailchimp
   Learn more

Privacy Policy

   What we do (and don't do!) with the information you give us
   Learn more

API Use Policy

   Rules for developers who use our API
   Learn more

Copyright and Trademark Policy

   What to do if you think a Mailchimp user infringed your IP rights
   Learn more

Cookie Statement

   How we use cookies and similar technologies
   Learn more
   Illustration of a person walking while holding an umbrella

Data Processing Addendum

   Our agreement that governs data processing activities for personal data
   Learn more

Mailchimp Presents

   Illustration of a young, African American girl with her back to us.
   Large eyes are glaring at her in judgement, invoking the sense that she
   does not fit in.

   A collection of short-form series, films, and podcasts created with
   entrepreneurs in mind. Now playing: Outer Monologue, an inspiring new
   animated series from Mailchimp.
   Learn more

Company

     * Our Story
     * Careers
     * Contact
     * Newsroom

Product

     * Email
     * Mobile App
     * Help
     * Developers
     * Status
     * Security
     * What's New

Community

     * Partner Program
     * Experts Directory
     * Integrations Directory
     * Agencies
     * Events
     * Marketing Glossary

     * Facebook
     * Twitter
     * Instagram
     * LinkedIn
     * YouTube

     * [KB]
     * Get it on Google Play

   ©2001-2019 All Rights Reserved. Mailchimp® is a registered trademark of
   The Rocket Science Group. Apple and the Apple logo are trademarks of
   Apple Inc., registered in the U.S. and other countries. Mac App Store
   is a service mark of Apple Inc. Google Play and the Google Play logo
   are trademarks of Google Inc. Privacy & Terms
   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate
   alternate alternate alternate

   Skip to main content
     * Why Mailchimp?
     * Marketing Platform
          + Illustration of stars and planets Overview
            All the tools you need to market smarter and grow faster.
          + Illustration of a finger tip puppet Audience
               o Marketing CRM
               o Audience Dashboard
               o Tags
               o Segmentation
               o Lookalike Audiences
               o Address Finder
          + Brand
               o Content Studio
               o Templates
          + Layered squares stacked Campaigns
               o Email
               o Social Media
               o Landing Pages
               o Digital Ads
               o Postcards
               o Automations
          + Illustration of a magnifying glass Insights
               o Reports & Analytics
               o Smart Recommendations
               o Integrations
     * Pricing
     * Resources
          + Overview
          + Mailchimp 101
            Everything you need to get started
          + Marketing Tips
            Learn how to master marketing
          + Guides & Tutorials
            Get step-by-step help with Mailchimp
          + MCP - Illustration Mailchimp Presents
            Entertainment made for entrepreneurs

     *
     * Search ____________________ (BUTTON)
     *
     * Log In
     * Sign Up Free
     * Log In
     * Sign Up Free
     *
          + Audience
          + Dashboard
          + Campaigns
          + Reports
          + Account
          + Log In

   (BUTTON)

Legal

Privacy Policy

   Download

   In this document
     * 1. The Basics
     * 2. Privacy for Members
     * 3. Privacy for Contacts
     * 4. Privacy for Visitors
     * 5. General Information

   Effective December 5, 2018
   View the prior version of our privacy policy (last updated November 1,
   2017) here.

   Mailchimp takes data privacy seriously. This privacy policy explains
   who we are, how we collect, share and use Personal Information, and how
   you can exercise your privacy rights.

   We recommend that you read this privacy policy in full to ensure you
   are fully informed. However, to make it easier for you to review the
   parts of this privacy policy that apply to you, we have divided up the
   document into sections that are specifically applicable to Members
   (Section 2), Contacts (Section 3), and Visitors (Section 4). Sections 1
   and 5 are applicable to everyone.

   If you have any questions or concerns about our use of your Personal
   Information, then please contact us using the contact details provided
   at the end of Section 5.
   TRUSTe

1. The Basics

A. About Us

   Mailchimp is an online marketing platform (the "Services") operated by
   The Rocket Science Group LLC, a company headquartered in the State of
   Georgia in the United States ("we," "us," "our," and "Mailchimp").

   The Services enable our Members to, among other things, send and manage
   email campaigns and serve advertisements. We also provide other related
   services, such as real-time data analytics. Find out more about our
   Services here.

B. Key Terms

   In this privacy policy, these terms have the following meanings:

   "Contact" is a person a Member may contact through our Services. In
   other words, a Contact is anyone on a Member's Distribution List or
   about whom a Member has given us information. For example, if you are a
   Member, a subscriber to your email marketing campaigns would be
   considered a Contact.

   "Distribution List" is a list of Contacts a Member may upload or manage
   on our platform and all associated information related to those
   Contacts (for example, email addresses).

   "Member" means any person or entity that is registered with us to use
   the Services.

   "Personal Information" means any information that identifies or can be
   used to identify a Member, a Contact, or a Visitor, directly or
   indirectly. Examples of Personal Information include, but are not
   limited to, first and last name, date of birth, email address, gender,
   occupation, or other demographic information.

   "Website(s)" means any website(s) we own and operate (such as
   www.mailchimp.com) or any web pages, interactive features,
   applications, widgets, blogs, social networks, social network "tabs,"
   or other online, mobile, or wireless offerings that post a link to this
   privacy policy.

   "Visitor" means any person who visits any of our Websites.

   "you" and "your" means, depending on the context, either a Member, a
   Contact, or a Visitor.

2. Privacy for Members

   This section applies to the Personal Information we collect and process
   from a Member or potential Member through the provision of the
   Services. If you are not a Member, the Visitors or Contacts section of
   this policy may be more applicable to you and your data. In this
   section, "you" and "your" refer to Members and potential Members.

A. Information We Collect

   The Personal Information that we may collect broadly falls into the
   following categories:

   (i) Information you provide to us: In the course of engaging with our
   Services, you may provide Personal Information about you and your
   Contacts. Personal Information is often, but not exclusively, provided
   to us when you sign up for and use the Services, consult with our
   customer service team, send us an email, integrate the Services with
   another website or service (for example, when you choose to connect
   your e-commerce account with Mailchimp), or communicate with us in any
   other way.

   We will let you know prior to collection whether the provision of
   Personal Information we are collecting is compulsory or if it may be
   provided on a voluntary basis and the consequences, if any, of not
   providing the information. By giving us this information, you agree to
   this information being collected, used and disclosed as described in
   our Terms of Use and in this privacy policy.

   This information may include:
     * Registration information: You need a Mailchimp account to use the
       Services as a Member. When you register for an account, you will be
       asked to provide certain basic information, such as your name,
       email address, username, password, company name, occupation,
       location, and phone number (for example, if you are using
       two-factor authentication).
     * Billing and communications information: If you purchase our
       Services, you may also need to provide us with payment and billing
       information, such as your credit card details and billing address.
       Mailchimp will also maintain a record of your billing transactions
       and purchases, and any communications and responses.
     * Information we process on your behalf: In order to send an email
       campaign or use certain features in your account, you need to
       upload a Distribution List that provides us information about your
       Contacts, such as their names and email addresses. We use and
       process this information to provide the Services in accordance with
       your instructions.

   (ii) Information we collect automatically: When you use the Services,
   we may automatically collect certain information about your device and
   usage of the Services. We use cookies and other tracking technologies
   to collect some of this information. Our use of cookies and other
   tracking technologies is discussed more below, and in more detail in
   our Cookie Statement here.

   This information may include:
     * Device information: We collect information about the device and
       applications you use to access the Services, such as your IP
       address, your operating system, your browser ID, and other
       information about your system and connection.
     * Log data: Our web servers keep log files that record data each time
       a device accesses those servers and those log files contain data
       about the nature of each access, including originating IP
       addresses. We may also access metadata and other information
       associated with files that you upload into our Services.
     * Product usage data: We collect usage data about you whenever you
       interact with our Services, which may include the dates and times
       you access the Services and your browsing activities (such as what
       portions of the Services are used). We also collect information
       regarding the performance of the Services, including metrics
       related to the deliverability of emails and other communications
       you send through the Services. This information allows us to
       improve the content and operation of the Services, and facilitate
       research and analysis of the Services.

   (iii) Information we collect from other sources: From time to time, we
   may obtain information about you or your Contacts from third-party
   sources, such as public databases, social media platforms, third-party
   data providers and our joint marketing partners. We take steps to
   ensure that such third parties are legally or contractually permitted
   to disclose such information to us.
     * Examples of the information we receive from other sources include
       demographic information (such as age and gender), device
       information (such as IP addresses), location (such as city and
       state), and online behavioral data (such as information about use
       of social media websites, page view information and search results
       and links). We use this information, alone or in combination with
       other information (including Personal Information) we collect, to
       enhance our ability to provide relevant marketing and content to
       you and to develop and provide you with more relevant products,
       features, and services.

   (iv) Information from the use of our mobile apps: When you use our
   mobile apps, we may collect certain device and usage-related
   information in addition to information described elsewhere in this
   privacy policy.
     * Device information: We may collect information about the type of
       device and operating system you use. We do not ask for, access, or
       track any location-based information from your mobile device at any
       time while downloading or using our mobile apps or Services.
     * Product usage data: We may use mobile analytics software (such as
       Fabric.io) to better understand how people use our application. We
       may collect information about how often you use the application and
       other performance data.

B. Use of Personal Information

   We may use the Personal Information we collect through the Services or
   other sources for a range of reasons, including:
     * To bill and collect money owed to us by you. This includes sending
       you emails, invoices, receipts, notices of delinquency, and
       alerting you if we need a different credit card number. We use
       third parties for secure credit card transaction processing, and
       those third parties collect billing information to process your
       orders and credit card payments. To learn more about the steps we
       take to safeguard that data, see the "Our Security" section of this
       privacy policy.
     * To send you system alert messages. For example, we may inform you
       about temporary or permanent changes to our Services, such as
       planned outages, or send you account, security or compliance
       notifications, such as new features, version updates, releases,
       abuse warnings, and changes to this privacy policy.
     * To communicate with you about your account and provide customer
       support. For example, if you use our mobile apps, we may ask you if
       you want to receive push notifications about activity in your
       account. If you have opted in to these push notifications and no
       longer want to receive them, you may turn them off through your
       operating system.
     * To enforce compliance with our Terms of Use and applicable law, and
       to protect the rights and safety of our Members and third parties,
       as well as our own. This may include developing tools and
       algorithms that help us prevent violations. For example, sometimes
       we review the content of our Members’ email campaigns to make sure
       they comply with our Terms of Use. To improve that process, we have
       software that helps us find email campaigns that may violate our
       Terms of Use. Our employees or independent contractors may review
       those particular email campaigns. This benefits all Members who
       comply with our Terms of Use because it reduces the amount of spam
       being sent through our servers and helps us maintain high
       deliverability. Email was not built for confidential information.
       Please do not use Mailchimp to send confidential information.
     * To meet legal requirements, including complying with court orders,
       valid discovery requests, valid subpoenas, and other appropriate
       legal mechanisms.
     * To provide information to representatives and advisors, including
       attorneys and accountants, to help us comply with legal,
       accounting, or security requirements.
     * To prosecute and defend a court, arbitration, or similar legal
       proceeding.
     * To respond to lawful requests by public authorities, including to
       meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
     * To provide, support and improve the Services. For example, this may
       include sharing your or your Contacts’ information with third
       parties in order to provide and support our Services or to make
       certain features of the Services available to you. When we share
       Personal Information with third parties, we take steps to protect
       your information by requiring these third parties to enter into a
       contract with us that requires them to use the Personal Information
       we transfer to them in a manner that is consistent with this
       privacy policy and applicable privacy laws.
     * To provide suggestions to you. This includes adding features that
       compare Members’ email campaigns, using data to suggest other
       publishers your Contacts may be interested in, or using data to
       suggest products or services that you may be interested in or that
       may be relevant to you or your Contacts. Some of these suggestions
       are generated by use of our data analytics projects, which are
       described below. For more information about our use of cookies and
       other tracking technologies for this purpose, and instructions
       about how to opt out of having data collected through the use of
       cookies, please see our Cookie Statement here.
     * For our data analytics projects. Our data analytics projects use
       data from Mailchimp accounts, including Personal Information of
       Contacts, to provide and improve the Services. We use information
       like your sending habits and your Contacts’ details and purchase
       history, so we can make more informed predictions, decisions, and
       products for our Members. If you or your Contact prefers not to
       share this data, you can alter the security settings on your
       account (as described here) to opt out of data analytics projects,
       or your Contact can opt out of data analytics projects at any time
       by emailing us at personaldatarequests@mailchimp.com. For example,
       we use data from Mailchimp accounts to enable product
       recommendation, audience segmentation, and predicted demographics
       features for our Members. We will act as a data controller to
       process data for our data analytics projects in reliance on our
       legitimate business interests of improving and enhancing our
       products and services for our Members. As always, we take the
       privacy of Personal Information seriously, and will continue to
       implement appropriate safeguards to protect this Personal
       Information from misuse or unauthorized disclosure.
     * Combined information. We may combine Personal Information with
       other information we collect or obtain about you (such as
       information we source from our third-party partners) to serve you
       specifically, such as to deliver a product or service according to
       your preferences or restrictions, or for advertising or targeting
       purposes in accordance with this privacy policy. When we combine
       Personal Information with other information in this way, we treat
       it as, and apply all of the safeguards in this privacy policy
       applicable to, Personal Information.
     * Other purposes. To carry out other legitimate business purposes, as
       well as other lawful purposes about which we will notify you.

C. Cookies and Tracking Technologies

   We and our partners may use various technologies to collect and store
   information when you use our Services, and this may include using
   cookies and similar tracking technologies, such as pixels and web
   beacons. For example, we use web beacons in the emails we send on your
   behalf. These web beacons track certain behavior such as whether the
   email sent through the Services was delivered and opened and whether
   links within the email were clicked. They also allow us to collect
   information such as the recipient’s IP address, browser, email client
   type and other similar details. We use this information to measure the
   performance of your email campaigns, and to provide analytics
   information and enhance the effectiveness of our Services. Reports are
   also available to us when we send email to you, so we may collect and
   review that information.

   Our use of cookies and other tracking technologies is discussed in more
   detail in our Cookie Statement here.

D. Member Distribution Lists

   A Distribution List can be created in a number of ways, including by
   importing Contacts, such as through a CSV or directly from your email
   client. Your Distribution Lists are stored on a secure Mailchimp
   server. We do not, under any circumstances, sell your Distribution
   Lists. If someone on your Distribution List complains or contacts us,
   we might then contact that person. You may export (download) your
   Distribution Lists from Mailchimp at any time.

   If we detect abusive or illegal behavior related to your Distribution
   List, we may share your Distribution List or portions of it with
   affected ISPs or anti-spam organizations to the extent permitted or
   required by applicable law.

   If a Contact chooses to use the Forward to a Friend (FTF) link in an
   email campaign a Member sends, it will allow the Contact to share the
   Member’s email content with individuals not on the Member’s
   Distribution List. When a Contact forwards an email to a friend, we do
   not store the Contact’s email address or their friend’s email address,
   and no one is added to any Distribution List as a result of the FTF
   link. The Member who created the email campaign only sees an aggregate
   number of times their email campaign was forwarded by a Contact and
   does not have access to the email addresses used to share or receive
   that forwarded content.

E. Other Data Protection Rights

   You and your Contacts may have the following data protection rights:
     * To access, correct, update or request deletion of Personal
       Information. Mailchimp takes reasonable steps to ensure that the
       data we collect is reliable for its intended use, accurate,
       complete and up to date. As a Member, you can manage many of your
       individual account and profile settings within the dashboard
       provided through the Mailchimp platform, or you may contact us
       directly by emailing us at personaldatarequests@mailchimp.com. You
       can also manage information about your Contacts within the
       dashboard provided through the Mailchimp platform to assist you
       with responding to requests to access, correct, update or delete
       information that you receive from your Contacts.
     * In addition, individuals who are residents of the EEA can object to
       processing of their Personal Information, ask to restrict
       processing of their Personal Information or request portability of
       their Personal Information. You can exercise these rights by
       contacting us using the contact details provided in the "Questions
       and Concerns" section below. If any of your Contacts wishes to
       exercise any of these rights, they should contact you directly, or
       contact us as described in the "Privacy for Contacts" section
       below.
     * Similarly, if Personal Information is collected or processed on the
       basis of consent, the data subject can withdraw their consent at
       any time. Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness
       of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will
       it affect processing of your Personal Information conducted in
       reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent. If you
       receive these requests from Contacts, you can segment your lists
       within the Mailchimp platform to ensure that you only market to
       Contacts who have not opted out of receiving such marketing.
     * The right to complain to a data protection authority about the
       collection and use of Personal Information. For more information,
       please contact your local data protection authority. Contact
       details for data protection authorities in the EEA are available
       here.

   We respond to all requests we receive from individuals wishing to
   exercise their data protection rights in accordance with applicable
   data protection law. We may ask you to verify your identity in order to
   help us respond efficiently to your request. If we receive a request
   from one of your Contacts, we will either direct the Contact to reach
   out to you, or, if appropriate, we may respond directly to their
   request.

3. Privacy for Contacts

   This section applies to the information we process about our Members’
   Contacts as a data controller pursuant to our legitimate business
   interests, as explained in the "Legal Basis for Processing" section
   below. Our Services are intended for use by our Members. As a result,
   for much of the Personal Information we collect and process about
   Contacts through the Services, we act as a processor on behalf of our
   Members. Mailchimp is not responsible for the privacy or security
   practices of our Members, which may differ from those set forth in this
   privacy policy. Please check with individual Members about the policies
   they have in place. For purposes of this section, "you" and "your"
   refer to Contacts.

A. Information We Collect

   The Personal Information that we may collect or receive about you
   broadly falls into the following categories:

   (i) Information we receive about Contacts from our Members: A Member
   may provide Personal Information about you to us through the Services.
   For example, when a Member uploads their Distribution List or
   integrates the Services with another website or service (for example,
   when a Member chooses to connect their e-commerce account with
   Mailchimp), or when you sign up for a Member’s Distribution List on a
   Mailchimp signup form, they may provide us with certain contact
   information or other Personal Information about you such as your name,
   email address, address or telephone number. You may have the
   opportunity to update some of this information by electing to update or
   manage your preferences via an email you receive from a Member.

   (ii) Information we collect automatically: When you interact with an
   email campaign that you receive from a Member or browse or purchase
   from a Member’s connected store, we may collect information about your
   device and interaction with an email. We use cookies and other tracking
   technologies to collect some of this information. Our use of cookies
   and other tracking technologies is discussed more below, and in more
   detail in our Cookie Statement here.
     * Device information: We collect information about the device and
       applications you use to access emails sent through our Services,
       such as your IP address, your operating system, your browser ID,
       and other information about your system and connection.
     * Product usage data: We collect usage data about you whenever you
       interact with emails sent through the Services, which may include
       dates and times you access emails and your browsing activities
       (such as what pages are viewed). We also collect information
       regarding the performance of the Services, including metrics
       related to the deliverability of emails and other electronic
       communications our Members send through the Services. This
       information allows us to improve the content and operation of the
       Services, and facilitate research and analysis of the Services.

   (iii) Information we collect from other sources: From time to time, we
   may obtain information about you from third-party sources, such as
   social media platforms and third-party data providers. We take steps to
   ensure that such third parties are legally or contractually permitted
   to disclose such information to us, and we use this information to
   provide publicly available social media information about you to
   Members who have enabled the "Social Profiles" feature in their
   Mailchimp accounts.

B. Use of Personal Information

   We may use the Personal Information we collect or receive about you for
   our legitimate business interests, including:
     * To enforce compliance with our Terms of Use and applicable law.
       This may include developing tools and algorithms that help us
       prevent violations.
     * To protect the rights and safety of our Members and third parties,
       as well as our own. For example, sometimes we review the content of
       our Members’ email campaigns to make sure they comply with our
       Terms of Use. To improve that process, we have software that helps
       us find email campaigns that may violate our Terms of Use. Our
       employees or independent contractors may review those particular
       email campaigns, which may include your contact information. This
       reduces the amount of spam being sent through our servers and helps
       us maintain high deliverability.
     * To meet legal requirements, including complying with court orders,
       valid discovery requests, valid subpoenas, and other appropriate
       legal mechanisms.
     * To provide information to representatives and advisors, including
       attorneys and accountants, to help us comply with legal,
       accounting, or security requirements.
     * To prosecute and defend a court, arbitration, or similar legal
       proceeding.
     * To respond to lawful requests by public authorities, including to
       meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
     * To provide, support and improve the Services. For example, this may
       include sharing your information with third parties in order to
       provide and support our Services or to make certain features of the
       Services available to our Members. When we share Personal
       Information with third parties, we take steps to protect your
       information by requiring these third parties to enter into a
       contract with us that requires them to use the Personal Information
       we transfer to them in a manner that is consistent with this
       privacy policy and applicable privacy laws.
     * For our data analytics projects. Our data analytics projects use
       data from Mailchimp accounts, including your Personal Information,
       to provide and improve the Services. We use information, like your
       purchase history, provided to us by Members, so we can make more
       informed predictions, decisions, and products for our Members. For
       example, we use data from Mailchimp accounts to enable product
       recommendation, audience segmentation, and predicted demographics
       features for our Members. If you prefer not to share this data, you
       can opt out of data analytics projects at any time by emailing us
       at personaldatarequests@mailchimp.com.
     * Other purposes. To carry out other legitimate business purposes, as
       well as other lawful purposes.

C. Cookies and Tracking Technologies

   We and our partners may use various technologies to collect and store
   information when you interact with a Member’s email campaign or
   connected store, and this may include using cookies and similar
   tracking technologies, such as pixels and web beacons. For example, we
   use web beacons in the emails we send on behalf of our Members. When
   you receive and engage with a Member’s campaign, web beacons track
   certain behavior such as whether the email sent through the Mailchimp
   platform was delivered and opened and whether links within the email
   were clicked. They also allow us to collect information such as your IP
   address, browser, email client type, and other similar details. We use
   this information to measure the performance of our Members’ email
   campaigns, and to provide analytics information and enhance the
   effectiveness of our Services.

   Our use of cookies and other tracking technologies is discussed in more
   detail in our Cookie Statement here.

D. Legal Basis for Processing

   We process Personal Information about you as a data controller as
   described in this section, where such processing is in our legitimate
   interests and not overridden by your data protection interests or
   fundamental rights and freedoms. Our legitimate interests typically
   include: improving, maintaining, providing, and enhancing our
   technology, products and services; and ensuring the security of the
   Services and our Website.

E. Other Data Protection Rights

   You may have the following data protection rights:
     * To access, correct, update or request deletion of your Personal
       Information. Mailchimp takes reasonable steps to ensure that the
       data we collect is reliable for its intended use, accurate,
       complete, and up to date. You may contact us directly at any time
       about accessing, correcting, updating or deleting your Personal
       Information, or altering your data, by submitting a request to us
       here. We will consider your request in accordance with applicable
       laws.
     * In addition, if you are a resident of the EEA, you can object to
       processing of your Personal Information, ask us to restrict
       processing of your Personal Information or request portability of
       your Personal Information. Again, you can exercise these rights by
       emailing us at personaldatarequests@mailchimp.com.
     * You have the right to complain to a data protection authority about
       our collection and use of your Personal Information. For more
       information, please contact your local data protection authority.
       Contact details for data protection authorities in the EEA are
       available here.

   As described above, for much of the Personal Information we collect and
   process about Contacts through the Services, we act as a processor on
   behalf of our Members. In such cases, if you are a Contact and want to
   exercise any data protection rights that may be available to you under
   applicable law or have questions or concerns about how your Personal
   Information is handled by Mailchimp as a processor on behalf of our
   individual Members, you should contact the relevant Member that is
   using the Mailchimp Services, and refer to their separate privacy
   policies.

   If you no longer want to be contacted by one of our Members through our
   Services, please unsubscribe directly from that Member’s newsletter or
   contact the Member directly to update or delete your data. If you
   contact us directly, we may remove or update your information within a
   reasonable time and after providing notice to the Member of your
   request.

   We respond to all requests we receive from individuals wishing to
   exercise their data protection rights in accordance with applicable
   data protection laws. We may ask you to verify your identity in order
   to help us respond efficiently to your request.

4. Privacy for Visitors

   This section applies to Personal Information that we collect and
   process through our Websites and in the usual course of our business,
   such as in connection with our recruitment, events, sales and marketing
   activities. In this section "you" and "your" refers to Visitors.

A. Information We Collect

   (i) Information you provide to us on the Websites or otherwise: Certain
   parts of our Websites may ask you to provide Personal Information
   voluntarily. For example, we may ask you to provide certain Personal
   Information (such as your name, contact details, company name, profile
   information) in order to sign up for a free or paid Mailchimp account,
   apply for a role with Mailchimp, or otherwise submit inquiries to us.
   We may also collect Personal Information, such as your contact and job
   details and feedback, when you attend our events, take part in surveys,
   or through other business or marketing interactions we may have with
   you. You may choose to provide additional information when you
   communicate with us or otherwise interact with us, and we will keep
   copies of any such communications for our records.

   The Personal Information that you are asked to provide, and the reasons
   why you are asked to provide it, will be made clear to you at the point
   we ask you to provide your Personal Information. We will also let you
   know prior to collection whether the provision of the Personal
   Information we are collecting is compulsory or may be provided on a
   voluntary basis and the consequences, if any, of not providing the
   information.

   (ii) Information we collect automatically through the Websites: When
   you visit our Websites, we may also collect certain information
   automatically from your device. In some countries, including countries
   in the European Economic Area, this information may be considered
   Personal Information under applicable data protection laws.

   Specifically, the information we collect automatically may include your
   IP address, your operating system, your browser ID, your browsing
   activity, and other information about your system and connection and
   how you interact with our Websites and other websites. We may collect
   this information as a part of log files as well as through the use of
   cookies or other tracking technologies. Our use of cookies and other
   tracking technologies is discussed more below, and in more detail in
   our Cookie Statement here.

B. Use of Personal Information

   We may use the information we collect through our Websites for a range
   of reasons, including:
     * To provide, operate, optimize, and maintain our Websites.
     * To send you information for marketing purposes, in accordance with
       your marketing preferences.
     * For recruitment purposes if you have applied for a role with
       Mailchimp.
     * To respond to your online inquiries and requests, and to provide
       you with information and access to resources or services that you
       have requested from us.
     * To manage our Websites and system administration and security.
     * To improve the navigation and content of our Websites.
     * To identify any server problems or other IT or network issues.
     * To process transactions and to set up online accounts.
     * To compile aggregated statistics about site usage and to better
       understand the preferences of our Visitors.
     * To carry out research and development to improve our products and
       services.
     * To customize content and layout of the Websites.
     * To carry out other legitimate business purposes, as well as other
       lawful purposes.

   In addition, we may combine Personal Information with other information
   we collect or obtain about you (such as information we source from our
   third-party partners) to serve you specifically, such as to deliver a
   product or service according to your preferences or restrictions, or
   for advertising or targeting purposes in accordance with this privacy
   policy. When we combine Personal Information with other information in
   this way, we treat it as, and apply all of the safeguards in this
   privacy policy applicable to, Personal Information.

C. Public Information and Third-Party Websites

     * Blog. We have public blogs on our Websites. Any information you
       include in a comment on our blog may be read, collected, and used
       by anyone. If your Personal Information appears on our blogs and
       you want it removed, contact us here. If we are unable to remove
       your information, we will tell you why.
     * Social media platforms and widgets. Our Websites include social
       media features, such as the Facebook Like button. These features
       may collect information about your IP address and which page you
       are visiting on our Website, and they may set a cookie to make sure
       the feature functions properly. Social media features and widgets
       are either hosted by a third party or hosted directly on our
       Website. We also maintain presences on social media platforms,
       including Facebook, Twitter, and Instagram. Any information,
       communications, or materials you submit to us via a social media
       platform is done at your own risk without any expectation of
       privacy. We cannot control the actions of other users of these
       platforms or the actions of the platforms themselves. Your
       interactions with those features and platforms are governed by the
       privacy policies of the companies that provide them.
     * Links to third-party websites. Our Websites include links to other
       websites, whose privacy practices may be different from ours. If
       you submit Personal Information to any of those sites, your
       information is governed by their privacy policies. We encourage you
       to carefully read the privacy policy of any website you visit.
     * Contests and sweepstakes. We may, from time to time, offer surveys,
       contests, sweepstakes, or other promotions on our Websites or
       through social media (collectively, "Promotions"). Participation in
       our Promotions is completely voluntary. Information requested for
       entry may include Personal Information such as your name, address,
       date of birth, phone number, email address, username, and similar
       details. We use the information you provide to administer our
       Promotions. We may also, unless prohibited by the Promotion’s rules
       or law, use the information provided to communicate with you, or
       other people you select, about our Services. We may share this
       information with our affiliates and other organizations or service
       providers in line with this privacy policy and the rules posted for
       our Promotions.

D. Cookies and Tracking Technologies

   We use cookies and similar tracking technologies to collect and use
   Personal Information about you, including to serve interest-based
   advertising. For further information about the types of cookies and
   tracking technologies we use, why, and how you can control them, please
   see our Cookie Statement here.

E. Other Data Protection Rights

   You have the following data protection rights:
     * To access, correct, update, or request deletion of your Personal
       Information. Mailchimp takes reasonable steps to ensure that the
       data we collect is reliable for its intended use, accurate,
       complete, and up to date. You may contact us directly at any time
       about accessing, correcting, updating, or deleting your Personal
       Information, or altering your data or marketing preferences by
       emailing us at personaldatarequests@mailchimp.com. We will consider
       your request in accordance with applicable laws.
     * In addition, if you are a resident of the EEA, you can object to
       processing of your Personal Information, ask us to restrict
       processing of your Personal Information or request portability of
       your Personal Information. Again, you can exercise these rights by
       emailing us at personaldatarequests@mailchimp.com.
     * Similarly, if we have collected and processed your Personal
       Information with your consent, then you can withdraw your consent
       at any time. Withdrawing your consent will not affect the
       lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal,
       nor will it affect processing of your Personal Information
       conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than
       consent.
     * You have the right to complain to a data protection authority about
       our collection and use of your Personal Information. For more
       information, please contact your local data protection authority.
       Contact details for data protection authorities in the EEA are
       available here.

   We respond to all requests we receive from individuals wishing to
   exercise their data protection rights in accordance with applicable
   data protection laws. We may ask you to verify your identity in order
   to help us respond efficiently to your request.

5. General Information

A. How We Share Information

   We may share and disclose your Personal Information to the following
   types of third parties for the purposes described in this privacy
   policy (for purposes of this section, "you" and "your" refer to
   Members, Contacts, and Visitors unless otherwise indicated):

   (i) Our service providers: Sometimes, we share your information with
   our third-party service providers, who help us provide and support our
   Services and other business-related functions.

   For example, if it is necessary to provide Members something they have
   requested (like enable a feature such as Social Profiles), then we may
   share Members’ or Contacts’ Personal Information with a service
   provider for that purpose. Other examples include analyzing data,
   hosting data, engaging technical support for our Services, processing
   payments, and delivering content.

   These third-party service providers enter into a contract that requires
   them to use your Personal Information only for the provision of
   services to us and in a manner that is consistent with this privacy
   policy.

   In connection with our Services, we use a third-party service provider,
   Twilio, Inc. We use Twilio's API, which allows us to build features
   into our Mailchimp application to enable us to communicate with our
   Members through texting and calling, and their "Authy" product, which
   we use for two-factor authentication for our application. If you are a
   Member, Twilio may need to collect and process certain Personal
   Information about you as a controller to provide such services. To
   learn more about Twilio's privacy practices, please visit
   https://www.twilio.com/legal/privacy.

   (ii) Advertising partners: We may partner with third-party advertising
   networks and exchanges to display advertising on our Websites or to
   manage and serve our advertising on other sites and may share Personal
   Information of Members and Visitors with them for this purpose. We do
   not sell or market to any of our Members’ Contacts. We and our
   third-party partners may use cookies and other tracking technologies,
   such as pixels and web beacons, to gather information about your
   activities on our Websites and other sites in order to provide you with
   targeted advertising based on your browsing activities and interests.
   For more information about cookies and other tracking technologies,
   please see our Cookie Statement here.

   (iii) Any competent law enforcement body, regulatory body, government
   agency, court or other third party where we believe disclosure is
   necessary (a) as a matter of applicable law or regulation, (b) to
   exercise, establish, or defend our legal rights, or (c) to protect your
   vital interests or those of any other person.

   (iv) A potential buyer (and its agents and advisors) in the case of a
   sale, merger, consolidation, liquidation, reorganization, or
   acquisition. In that event, any acquirer will be subject to our
   obligations under this privacy policy, including your rights to access
   and choice. We will notify you of the change either by sending you an
   email or posting a notice on our Website.

   (v) Any other person with your consent.

B. Legal Basis for Processing Personal Information (EEA Persons Only)

   If you are from the European Economic Area, our legal basis for
   collecting and using the Personal Information described above will
   depend on the Personal Information concerned and the specific context
   in which we collect it.

   However, we will normally collect and use Personal Information from you
   where the processing is in our legitimate interests and not overridden
   by your data-protection interests or fundamental rights and freedoms.
   Typically, our legitimate interests include improving, maintaining,
   providing, and enhancing our technology, products, and services;
   ensuring the security of the Services and our Websites; and for our
   marketing activities.

   If you are a Member, we may need the Personal Information to perform a
   contract with you. In some limited cases, we may also have a legal
   obligation to collect Personal Information from you.

   If we ask you to provide Personal Information to comply with a legal
   requirement or to perform a contact with you, we will make this clear
   at the relevant time and advise you whether the provision of your
   Personal Information is mandatory or not, as well as of the possible
   consequences if you do not provide your Personal Information.

   Where required by law, we will collect Personal Information only where
   we have your consent to do so.

   If you have questions about or need further information concerning the
   legal basis on which we collect and use your Personal Information,
   please contact us using the contact details provided in the "Questions
   and Concerns" section below.

C. Your Choices and Opt-Outs

   Members and Visitors who have opted in to our marketing emails can opt
   out of receiving marketing emails from us at any time by clicking the
   "unsubscribe" link at the bottom of our marketing messages.

   Also, all opt-out requests can be made by emailing us using the contact
   details provided in the "Questions and Concerns" section below. Please
   note that some communications (such as service messages, account
   notifications, billing information) are considered transactional and
   necessary for account management, and Members cannot opt out of these
   messages unless you cancel your Mailchimp account.

D. Our Security

   We take appropriate and reasonable technical and organizational
   measures to protect Personal Information from loss, misuse,
   unauthorized access, disclosure, alteration, and destruction, taking
   into account the risks involved in the processing and the nature of the
   Personal Information. For further information about our security
   practices, please see our Security page here. If you have any questions
   about the security of your Personal Information, you may contact us at
   privacy@mailchimp.com.

   Mailchimp accounts require a username and password to log in. Members
   must keep their username and password secure, and never disclose it to
   a third party. Because the information in a Member’s Mailchimp account
   is so sensitive, account passwords are hashed, which means we cannot
   see a Member’s password. We cannot resend forgotten passwords either.
   We will only provide Members with instructions on how to reset them.

E. International Transfers

   (i) We operate in the United States

   Our servers and offices are located in the United States, so your
   information may be transferred to, stored, or processed in the United
   States. While the data protection, privacy, and other laws of the
   United States might not be as comprehensive as those in your country,
   we take many steps to protect your privacy, including offering our
   Members a Data Processing Agreement.

   (ii) Data transfers from Switzerland or the EU to the United States

   Mailchimp participates in and has certified its compliance with the
   EU-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework and the Swiss-U.S. Privacy Shield
   Framework. We are committed to subjecting all Personal Information
   received from European Union (EU) member countries and Switzerland,
   respectively, in reliance on each Privacy Shield Framework, to each
   Framework’s applicable Principles. To learn more about the Privacy
   Shield Frameworks, and to view our certification, visit the U.S.
   Department of Commerce’s Privacy Shield website, here.

   A list of Privacy Shield participants is maintained by the Department
   of Commerce and is available here.

   Mailchimp is responsible for the processing of Personal Information we
   receive under each Privacy Shield Framework and subsequently transfer
   to a third party acting as an agent on our behalf. We comply with the
   Privacy Shield Principles for all onward transfers of Personal
   Information from the EU and Switzerland, including the onward transfer
   liability provisions.

   With respect to Personal Information received or transferred pursuant
   to the Privacy Shield Frameworks, we are subject to the regulatory
   enforcement powers of the U.S. Federal Trade Commission. In certain
   situations, we may be required to disclose Personal Information in
   response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet
   national security or law enforcement requirements.

   If you have an unresolved privacy or data use concern that we have not
   addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third-party
   dispute resolution provider (free of charge to you) at
   https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request. Under certain
   conditions, more fully described on the Privacy Shield website, here,
   you may be entitled to invoke binding arbitration when other dispute
   resolution procedures have been exhausted.

   Members located in Switzerland and the EU are subject to our Data
   Processing Addendum, as described in our Terms of Use.

   (iii) Members located in Australia

   If you are a Member who lives in Australia, this section applies to
   you. We are subject to the operation of the Privacy Act 1988
   ("Australian Privacy Act"). Here are the specific points you should be
   aware of:
     * Where we say we assume an obligation about Personal Information, we
       are also requiring our subcontractors to undertake a similar
       obligation, where relevant.
     * We will not use or disclose Personal Information for the purpose of
       our direct marketing to you unless you have consented to receive
       direct marketing; you would reasonably expect us to use your
       personal details for the marketing; or we believe you may be
       interested in the material but it is impractical for us to obtain
       your consent. You may opt out of any marketing materials we send to
       you through an unsubscribe mechanism or by contacting us directly.
       If you have requested not to receive further direct marketing
       messages, we may continue to provide you with messages that are not
       regarded as "direct marketing" under the Australian Privacy Act,
       including changes to our terms, system alerts, and other
       information related to your account.
     * Our servers are located in the United States. In addition, we or
       our subcontractors may use cloud technology to store or process
       Personal Information, which may result in storage of data outside
       Australia. It is not practicable for us to specify in advance which
       country will have jurisdiction over this type of offshore activity.
       All of our subcontractors, however, are required to comply with the
       Australian Privacy Act in relation to the transfer or storage of
       Personal Information overseas.
     * If you think the information we hold about you is inaccurate, out
       of date, incomplete, irrelevant, or misleading, we will take
       reasonable steps, consistent with our obligations under the
       Australian Privacy Act, to correct that information upon your
       request.
     * If you are unsatisfied with our response to a privacy matter then
       you may consult either an independent advisor or contact the Office
       of the Australian Information Commissioner for additional help. We
       will provide our full cooperation if you pursue this course of
       action.

F. Retention of Data

   We retain Personal Information where we have an ongoing legitimate
   business or legal need to do so. Our retention periods will vary
   depending on the type of data involved, but, generally, we'll refer to
   these criteria in order to determine retention period:
     * Whether we have a legal or contractual need to retain the data.
     * Whether the data is necessary to provide our Services.
     * Whether our Members have the ability to access and delete the data
       within their Mailchimp accounts.
     * Whether our Members would reasonably expect that we would retain
       the data until they remove it or until their Mailchimp accounts are
       closed or terminated.

   When we have no ongoing legitimate business need to process your
   Personal Information, we will either delete or anonymize it or, if this
   is not possible (for example, because your Personal Information has
   been stored in backup archives), then we will securely store your
   Personal Information and isolate it from any further processing until
   deletion is possible.

G. California Privacy

   Under California Law, California residents have the right to request in
   writing from businesses with whom they have an established business
   relationship, (a) a list of the categories of Personal Information,
   such as name, email, and mailing address, and the type of services
   provided to the customer that a business has disclosed to third parties
   (including affiliates that are separate legal entities) during the
   immediately preceding calendar year for the third-parties’ direct
   marketing purposes, and (b) the names and addresses of all such third
   parties. To request the above information, please contact us through
   our contact form or email us at privacy@mailchimp.com.

H. Changes to this Policy

   We may change this privacy policy at any time and from time to time.
   The most recent version of the privacy policy is reflected by the
   version date located at the top of this privacy policy. All updates and
   amendments are effective immediately upon notice, which we may give by
   any means, including, but not limited to, by posting a revised version
   of this privacy policy or other notice on the Websites. We encourage
   you to review this privacy policy often to stay informed of changes
   that may affect you. Our electronically or otherwise properly stored
   copies of this privacy policy are each deemed to be the true, complete,
   valid, authentic, and enforceable copy of the version of this privacy
   policy that was in effect on each respective date you visited the
   Website.

I. Questions & Concerns

   If you have any questions or comments, or if you have a concern about
   the way in which we have handled any privacy matter, please use our
   contact form to send us a message. You may also contact us by postal
   mail or email at:

   For EEA Residents:

   For the purposes of EU data protection legislation, The Rocket Science
   Group LLC d/b/a Mailchimp is the controller of your Personal
   Information. Our Data Protection Officer can be contacted at
   dpo@mailchimp.com.

   For Non-EEA Residents:

   The Rocket Science Group LLC d/b/a Mailchimp
   Attn. Privacy Officer
   privacy@mailchimp.com
   675 Ponce de Leon Ave NE, Suite 5000
   Atlanta, GA 30308 USA

Mailchimp Presents

   Illustration of a young, African American girl with her back to us.
   Large eyes are glaring at her in judgement, invoking the sense that she
   does not fit in.

   A collection of short-form series, films, and podcasts created with
   entrepreneurs in mind. Now playing: Outer Monologue, an inspiring new
   animated series from Mailchimp.
   Learn more

Company

     * Our Story
     * Careers
     * Contact
     * Newsroom

Product

     * Email
     * Mobile App
     * Help
     * Developers
     * Status
     * Security
     * What's New

Community

     * Partner Program
     * Experts Directory
     * Integrations Directory
     * Agencies
     * Events
     * Marketing Glossary

     * Facebook
     * Twitter
     * Instagram
     * LinkedIn
     * YouTube

     * [KB]
     * Get it on Google Play

   ©2001-2019 All Rights Reserved. Mailchimp® is a registered trademark of
   The Rocket Science Group. Apple and the Apple logo are trademarks of
   Apple Inc., registered in the U.S. and other countries. Mac App Store
   is a service mark of Apple Inc. Google Play and the Google Play logo
   are trademarks of Google Inc. Privacy & Terms
   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate
   alternate alternate alternate

   Skip to main content
     * Why Mailchimp?
     * Marketing Platform
          + Illustration of stars and planets Overview
            All the tools you need to market smarter and grow faster.
          + Illustration of a finger tip puppet Audience
               o Marketing CRM
               o Audience Dashboard
               o Tags
               o Segmentation
               o Lookalike Audiences
               o Address Finder
          + Brand
               o Content Studio
               o Templates
          + Layered squares stacked Campaigns
               o Email
               o Social Media
               o Landing Pages
               o Digital Ads
               o Postcards
               o Automations
          + Illustration of a magnifying glass Insights
               o Reports & Analytics
               o Smart Recommendations
               o Integrations
     * Pricing
     * Resources
          + Overview
          + Mailchimp 101
            Everything you need to get started
          + Marketing Tips
            Learn how to master marketing
          + Guides & Tutorials
            Get step-by-step help with Mailchimp
          + MCP - Illustration Mailchimp Presents
            Entertainment made for entrepreneurs

     *
     * Search ____________________ (BUTTON)
     *
     * Log In
     * Sign Up Free
     * Log In
     * Sign Up Free
     *
          + Audience
          + Dashboard
          + Campaigns
          + Reports
          + Account
          + Log In

   (BUTTON)

What you can do with Mailchimp

   Gif of a hand with a finger puppet

Put your audience first

   Know who you’re talking to so you can say the right things.
   Learn more
   Gif of a pencil drawing a building

Bring your brand to life

   Look like a pro with elegant, easy-to-use design tools.
   Learn more
   gif of three connecting squares

Create integrated campaigns

   Spread the word with social, email, ads, and more.
   Learn more
   gif of a magnifying glass

Turn data into insights

   Our recommendations get smarter as you go.
   Learn more

A marketing platform for your business

     *

E‑commerce
   A person stands on top of a variety of shapes, while onlookers look up,
       very impressed
       Our marketing platform helps you find new customers, build stronger
       relationships, and boost sales through deeper customer insights.
       Learn more
     *

Mobile and web apps
   People holding up a six point star
       Reach new customers, send personalized behavior‑based campaigns,
       and increase engagement with your app.
       Learn more
     *

Startups
       Find product‑market fit, learn from user feedback, and launch your
       first marketing campaigns.
       Learn more

   A person stands on top of a variety of shapes, while onlookers look up,
   very impressed People holding up a six point star

   Daisy Downs, co-founder and VP of Brand at Urbansitter, smiles to
   someone off camera.

“With Mailchimp’s help, we’ve scaled our business nationally with one million
members and counting.”

   Daisy Downs, Co-Founder of UrbanSitter
   Learn More

Organic Social Posting

Introducing Organic Social Posting in Mailchimp

   Create and share social posts to engage people across Facebook,
   Instagram, and Twitter in a few quick clicks.

4 Tips for Getting a Head Start on Your Holiday Marketing

   Learn how early planning will help you lay the groundwork for a
   successful holiday season.

   World Art West's Executive Director Julie Mushe and Marketing and
   Communications Director Terry Conway

Targeting Smarter with Tags and Segments

   World Arts West uses tags and segments to make sure they're sharing
   content that matters to their different audiences.

You’ll be in good company

   East Fork
   Chronicle Books
   Fader
   Sweat
   Magnolia Bakery New York City

It’s easy to get started

   And it's free. Two things everyone loves.
   Pick A Plan
     __________________________________________________________________

Mailchimp Presents

   Illustration of a young, African American girl with her back to us.
   Large eyes are glaring at her in judgement, invoking the sense that she
   does not fit in.

   A collection of short-form series, films, and podcasts created with
   entrepreneurs in mind. Now playing: Outer Monologue, an inspiring new
   animated series from Mailchimp.
   Learn more

Company

     * Our Story
     * Careers
     * Contact
     * Newsroom

Product

     * Email
     * Mobile App
     * Help
     * Developers
     * Status
     * Security
     * What's New

Community

     * Partner Program
     * Experts Directory
     * Integrations Directory
     * Agencies
     * Events
     * Marketing Glossary

     * Facebook
     * Twitter
     * Instagram
     * LinkedIn
     * YouTube

     * [KB]
     * Get it on Google Play

   ©2001-2019 All Rights Reserved. Mailchimp® is a registered trademark of
   The Rocket Science Group. Apple and the Apple logo are trademarks of
   Apple Inc., registered in the U.S. and other countries. Mac App Store
   is a service mark of Apple Inc. Google Play and the Google Play logo
   are trademarks of Google Inc. Privacy & Terms
   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-MCZTKL

   This app works best with JavaScript enabled.

   Jump to content
   Introducing Mailchimp Presents - Short-form series, films, and podcasts
   created with entrepreneurs in mind. My Dear Kyrgyzstan - A Kyrgyz man
   attempts to transform his village into a tourism destination. Outer
   Monologue - An animated series exploring the narratives running through
   creative minds.
   Trailer

Introducing Mailchimp Presents

Short-form series, films, and podcasts created with entrepreneurs in mind.

   documentary

My Dear Kyrgyzstan

A Kyrgyz man attempts to transform his village into a tourism destination.

   series

Outer Monologue

An animated series exploring the narratives running through creative minds.

     * (BUTTON) 1
     * (BUTTON) 2
     * (BUTTON) 3

   Trailer

Introducing Mailchimp Presents

Short-form series, films, and podcasts created with entrepreneurs in mind.

   (BUTTON) (BUTTON) (BUTTON)

All Shows

   documentary

   The award-winning true story of Jay Wilde, a beef farmer and vegan.
   documentary
   podcast
   Going Through It

   A podcast hosted by Ann Friedman about deciding whether or not to quit.
   podcast
   documentary

   This is the story of the zine that changed Bay Area photography
   forever.
   documentary
   documentary

   A Kyrgyz man attempts to transform his village into a tourism
   destination.
   documentary
   series

   An animated series exploring the narratives running through creative
   minds.
   series
   series

   Second Act follows five people who’ve chosen a new direction in their
   careers.
   series
   series

   A scripted series about a small and quirky stock photography company.
   series
   podcast
   The Jump

   Shirley Manson talks with musicians about that one song that changed
   everything.
   podcast
   series

   A mockumentary exploring the hilarious, high-stakes world of trade
   shows.
   series
   series

   A docu-series featuring entrepreneurial advice from unexpected sources.
   series
   series

   A docu-series about a global community of people who work from their
   laptops.
   series
   podcast

The Jump

Introducing The Jump, a new podcast from Mailchimp. Available wherever you
get your podcasts.

   A collection of original content that celebrates the entrepreneurial
   spirit.

Sign up for news from
Mailchimp Presents

   Enter email address ____________________ (BUTTON)
   You can unsubscribe at any time using the link in our emails. For more
   details, review our privacy policy.
   Visit MailchimpPrivacy & TermsContact usHelp
   ©2001-2019 All Rights Reserved.
   Mailchimp® is a registered trademark of The Rocket Science Group LLC.
   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate
   alternate alternate alternate

   Skip to main content
     * Why Mailchimp?
     * Marketing Platform
          + Illustration of stars and planets Overview
            All the tools you need to market smarter and grow faster.
          + Illustration of a finger tip puppet Audience
               o Marketing CRM
               o Audience Dashboard
               o Tags
               o Segmentation
               o Lookalike Audiences
               o Address Finder
          + Brand
               o Content Studio
               o Templates
          + Layered squares stacked Campaigns
               o Email
               o Social Media
               o Landing Pages
               o Digital Ads
               o Postcards
               o Automations
          + Illustration of a magnifying glass Insights
               o Reports & Analytics
               o Smart Recommendations
               o Integrations
     * Pricing
     * Resources
          + Overview
          + Mailchimp 101
            Everything you need to get started
          + Marketing Tips
            Learn how to master marketing
          + Guides & Tutorials
            Get step-by-step help with Mailchimp
          + MCP - Illustration Mailchimp Presents
            Entertainment made for entrepreneurs

     *
     * Search ____________________ (BUTTON)
     *
     * Log In
     * Sign Up Free
     * Log In
     * Sign Up Free
     *
          + Audience
          + Dashboard
          + Campaigns
          + Reports
          + Account
          + Log In

   (BUTTON)

Flexible plans that grow with you

   Needs change as businesses grow. We’ll help you market smarter from day
   one.
   Illustration of people walking, holding, and climbing on ladders
   (BUTTON) Premium (BUTTON) Standard (BUTTON) Essentials (BUTTON) Free
   [$ USD__]

   CAPTION:

   Table that shows the cost of Mailchimp's four pricing plans and the top
   features available in each: the free plan, the Essential plan starting
   at $9.99 a month, the Standard plan starting at $14.99 a month, and the
   Premium plan starting at $299 a month.
   PLAN
   PLAN
   Premium

   Advanced features for pros who need more customization.
   PLAN
   Mailchimp Recommends
   Standard

   Better insights for growing businesses that want more customers.
   PLAN
   Essentials

   Must-have features for email senders who want added support.
   PLAN
   Free

   All the basics for businesses that are just getting started.
   PRICING
   PRICING
   PRICING
   Starting at
   $
   299
   00
   *
   a month
   Select
   Calculate your price
   PRICING
   PRICING
   Starting at
   $
   14
   99
   *
   a month
   Select
   Calculate your price
   PRICING
   PRICING
   Starting at
   $
   9
   99
   *
   a month
   Select
   Calculate your price
   PRICING
   PRICING
   Starting at
   $
   0
   *
   a month
   Get Started
   TOP FEATURES
   TOP FEATURES
     * TOP FEATURES
     * Everything in Standard, plus:
     * Advanced segmentation
     * Multivariate testing
     * Unlimited seats and role-based access
     * Phone support

   TOP FEATURES
     * TOP FEATURES
     * Everything in Essentials, plus:
     * Automation series
     * Retargeting ads
     * Custom templates
     * Advanced audience insights

   TOP FEATURES
     * TOP FEATURES
     * Everything in Free, plus:
     * All email templates
     * A/B testing
     * Custom branding
     * 24/7 award-winning support

   TOP FEATURES
     * TOP FEATURES
     * 7 marketing channels
     * 1-click automations
     * Basic templates
     * Marketing CRM

   CAPTION:

   Table showing a complete list of services and features that are
   available on each of Mailchimp's four pricing plans.
   Premium
   Standard
   Essentials

   Free

   Marketing CRM

   Contacts

   200,000+ **

   100,000**

   50,000**

   2,000

   Audiences

   Unlimited

   5

   3

   1

   Audience Dashboard

   Tags

   Segmentation

   Contact Profiles

   Predicted Demographics

   Customer Lifetime Value

   Purchase Likelihood

   Lookalike Audience Finder

   Address finder

   Brand & Design

   Content Studio

   Basic Templates

   All Pre-Built Templates

   Remove Mailchimp Footer

   Custom-Coded Templates

   Custom Domains

   $99/year

   $99/year

   $99/year

   $99/year

   Websites (Coming Soon)

   Marketing Channels

   Email

   Landing Pages

   Facebook & Instagram Ads

   Social Posting

   Postcards

   Pop-up Forms

   Retargeting Ads

   Google, Facebook, Instagram

   Automations

   Single-Step Automations

   Welcome email, order notifications, abandoned cart, and more

   Multi-Step Custom Workflows

   Nurture campaigns, onboarding series, and more

   Insights & Optimization

   Basic Reports

   Smart Recommendations

   Send Time Optimization

   Delivery by Time Zone

   A/B Testing

   Multivariate Testing

   Comparative Reporting

   Support

   Knowledge Base

   30 days of Email Support

   24/7 Email & Chat Support

   Phone Support

   Everything else

   Seats

   Unlimited

   5

   3

   1

   Monthly Email Sends

   3M+ **

   1.2M**

   500,000**

   10,000

   Integrations with 200+ Apps

   Mailchimp Mobile App

   **Calculate price based on audience size

   **Calculate price based on audience size

   **Calculate price based on audience size

   PLAN
   Premium
   PLAN
   Standard
   PLAN
   Essentials
   PLAN
   Free
   PRICING
   PRICING
   PRICING
   Starting at
   $
   299
   00
   *
   a month
   Select
   PRICING
   PRICING
   Starting at
   $
   14
   99
   *
   a month
   Select
   PRICING
   PRICING
   Starting at
   $
   9
   99
   *
   a month
   Select
   PRICING
   PRICING
   Starting at
   $
   0
   *
   a month
   Get Started

   Back to top

   *Actual price may vary. Prices displayed are estimates based on current
   exchange rates. Exact amount charged will vary and depends on the
   exchange rate at the time of payment processing. Prices displayed
   exclude any applicable taxes and fees, which will be added to the cost
   of all services purchased. For exact base pricing please refer to
   prices listed in USD.

   *Actual price may vary. Prices displayed are estimates based on the
   USD-GBP exchange rate. Exact amount charged will vary and depends on
   the exchange rate at the time of payment processing. Prices displayed
   exclude VAT, which will be added to the cost of all services purchased.
   For exact pricing please refer to prices listed in USD.

Prefer to pay as you go?

   Instead of paying a monthly recurring charge, you can buy email credits
   as needed through our Pay As You Go plan. It's best for infrequent
   senders.

   Two-factor authentication discount

   At Mailchimp, we’re serious about security. We offer a 10% discount for
   3 months when you add two-factor authentication to your Mailchimp
   account with an app like Google Authenticator or SMS two-factor
   authentication.
   Get started

   Rates for nonprofits and charities

   Mailchimp offers a 15% discount to nonprofits and charities. To request
   the discount, sign up for a free account, and contact our Billing team
   with your username and a link to your organization’s website.
   Get started

FAQs

     *

What payment methods do you offer?
       We accept all major credit cards, PayPal, and (in select countries)
       direct debit. We also support transactions in a range of
       currencies.
     *

How do I switch to a different plan?
       You can switch to a new plan at any time by going to the Billing
       page in your account. Select the plan you’d like to switch to and
       immediately start using new features.
     *

Can I buy credits instead?
       Yes. If you send emails infrequently and prefer to pay as you go,
       you can buy email credits as an alternative to a monthly plan.
       See how it works
     *

Do you have pricing for high-volume email senders?
       We do indeed. If you have more than 200,000 contacts, we have a
       high-volume plan that can meet your needs.
       Contact us for pricing
     *

What happens if I hit my contact or sending limit?
       You can add on a contact block, which includes additional email
       sends, to your plan at any time.

Mailchimp for agencies

   If you’re an agency, you probably want an agency account.
   Get The Details

You’ll be in good company

   East Fork
   Chronicle Books
   Fader
   Sweat
   Magnolia Bakery New York City

Mailchimp Presents

   Illustration of a young, African American girl with her back to us.
   Large eyes are glaring at her in judgement, invoking the sense that she
   does not fit in.

   A collection of short-form series, films, and podcasts created with
   entrepreneurs in mind. Now playing: Outer Monologue, an inspiring new
   animated series from Mailchimp.
   Learn more

Company

     * Our Story
     * Careers
     * Contact
     * Newsroom

Product

     * Email
     * Mobile App
     * Help
     * Developers
     * Status
     * Security
     * What's New

Community

     * Partner Program
     * Experts Directory
     * Integrations Directory
     * Agencies
     * Events
     * Marketing Glossary

     * Facebook
     * Twitter
     * Instagram
     * LinkedIn
     * YouTube

     * [KB]
     * Get it on Google Play

   ©2001-2019 All Rights Reserved. Mailchimp® is a registered trademark of
   The Rocket Science Group. Apple and the Apple logo are trademarks of
   Apple Inc., registered in the U.S. and other countries. Mac App Store
   is a service mark of Apple Inc. Google Play and the Google Play logo
   are trademarks of Google Inc. Privacy & Terms
   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate
   alternate alternate alternate

   Skip to main content
     * Why Mailchimp?
     * Marketing Platform
          + Illustration of stars and planets Overview
            All the tools you need to market smarter and grow faster.
          + Illustration of a finger tip puppet Audience
               o Marketing CRM
               o Audience Dashboard
               o Tags
               o Segmentation
               o Lookalike Audiences
               o Address Finder
          + Brand
               o Content Studio
               o Templates
          + Layered squares stacked Campaigns
               o Email
               o Social Media
               o Landing Pages
               o Digital Ads
               o Postcards
               o Automations
          + Illustration of a magnifying glass Insights
               o Reports & Analytics
               o Smart Recommendations
               o Integrations
     * Pricing
     * Resources
          + Overview
          + Mailchimp 101
            Everything you need to get started
          + Marketing Tips
            Learn how to master marketing
          + Guides & Tutorials
            Get step-by-step help with Mailchimp
          + MCP - Illustration Mailchimp Presents
            Entertainment made for entrepreneurs

     *
     * Search ____________________ (BUTTON)
     *
     * Log In
     * Sign Up Free
     * Log In
     * Sign Up Free
     *
          + Audience
          + Dashboard
          + Campaigns
          + Reports
          + Account
          + Log In

   (BUTTON)

Legal

   Thanks for taking the time to learn about Mailchimp's legal policies.
   It's important stuff. This is where you'll find information about how
   we protect your privacy, what you can and can't do with Mailchimp, and
   how we handle user accounts.
   Contact Legal

Standard Terms of Use

   The main agreement you're making in order to use Mailchimp
   Learn more
   An illustration of a eye looking through a magnifying glass

Additional Terms

   Some Mailchimp products are subject to additional usage terms and
   restrictions
   Learn more

Acceptable Use

   A set of rules about the types of content you can send through
   Mailchimp
   Learn more

Privacy Policy

   What we do (and don't do!) with the information you give us
   Learn more

API Use Policy

   Rules for developers who use our API
   Learn more

Copyright and Trademark Policy

   What to do if you think a Mailchimp user infringed your IP rights
   Learn more

Cookie Statement

   How we use cookies and similar technologies
   Learn more
   Illustration of a person walking while holding an umbrella

Data Processing Addendum

   Our agreement that governs data processing activities for personal data
   Learn more

Mailchimp Presents

   Illustration of a young, African American girl with her back to us.
   Large eyes are glaring at her in judgement, invoking the sense that she
   does not fit in.

   A collection of short-form series, films, and podcasts created with
   entrepreneurs in mind. Now playing: Outer Monologue, an inspiring new
   animated series from Mailchimp.
   Learn more

Company

     * Our Story
     * Careers
     * Contact
     * Newsroom

Product

     * Email
     * Mobile App
     * Help
     * Developers
     * Status
     * Security
     * What's New

Community

     * Partner Program
     * Experts Directory
     * Integrations Directory
     * Agencies
     * Events
     * Marketing Glossary

     * Facebook
     * Twitter
     * Instagram
     * LinkedIn
     * YouTube

     * [KB]
     * Get it on Google Play

   ©2001-2019 All Rights Reserved. Mailchimp® is a registered trademark of
   The Rocket Science Group. Apple and the Apple logo are trademarks of
   Apple Inc., registered in the U.S. and other countries. Mac App Store
   is a service mark of Apple Inc. Google Play and the Google Play logo
   are trademarks of Google Inc. Privacy & Terms
   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate
   alternate alternate alternate

   Skip to main content
     * Why Mailchimp?
     * Marketing Platform
          + Illustration of stars and planets Overview
            All the tools you need to market smarter and grow faster.
          + Illustration of a finger tip puppet Audience
               o Marketing CRM
               o Audience Dashboard
               o Tags
               o Segmentation
               o Lookalike Audiences
               o Address Finder
          + Brand
               o Content Studio
               o Templates
          + Layered squares stacked Campaigns
               o Email
               o Social Media
               o Landing Pages
               o Digital Ads
               o Postcards
               o Automations
          + Illustration of a magnifying glass Insights
               o Reports & Analytics
               o Smart Recommendations
               o Integrations
     * Pricing
     * Resources
          + Overview
          + Mailchimp 101
            Everything you need to get started
          + Marketing Tips
            Learn how to master marketing
          + Guides & Tutorials
            Get step-by-step help with Mailchimp
          + MCP - Illustration Mailchimp Presents
            Entertainment made for entrepreneurs

     *
     * Search ____________________ (BUTTON)
     *
     * Log In
     * Sign Up Free
     * Log In
     * Sign Up Free
     *
          + Audience
          + Dashboard
          + Campaigns
          + Reports
          + Account
          + Log In

   (BUTTON)

Legal

Privacy Policy

   Download

   In this document
     * 1. The Basics
     * 2. Privacy for Members
     * 3. Privacy for Contacts
     * 4. Privacy for Visitors
     * 5. General Information

   Effective December 5, 2018
   View the prior version of our privacy policy (last updated November 1,
   2017) here.

   Mailchimp takes data privacy seriously. This privacy policy explains
   who we are, how we collect, share and use Personal Information, and how
   you can exercise your privacy rights.

   We recommend that you read this privacy policy in full to ensure you
   are fully informed. However, to make it easier for you to review the
   parts of this privacy policy that apply to you, we have divided up the
   document into sections that are specifically applicable to Members
   (Section 2), Contacts (Section 3), and Visitors (Section 4). Sections 1
   and 5 are applicable to everyone.

   If you have any questions or concerns about our use of your Personal
   Information, then please contact us using the contact details provided
   at the end of Section 5.
   TRUSTe

1. The Basics

A. About Us

   Mailchimp is an online marketing platform (the "Services") operated by
   The Rocket Science Group LLC, a company headquartered in the State of
   Georgia in the United States ("we," "us," "our," and "Mailchimp").

   The Services enable our Members to, among other things, send and manage
   email campaigns and serve advertisements. We also provide other related
   services, such as real-time data analytics. Find out more about our
   Services here.

B. Key Terms

   In this privacy policy, these terms have the following meanings:

   "Contact" is a person a Member may contact through our Services. In
   other words, a Contact is anyone on a Member's Distribution List or
   about whom a Member has given us information. For example, if you are a
   Member, a subscriber to your email marketing campaigns would be
   considered a Contact.

   "Distribution List" is a list of Contacts a Member may upload or manage
   on our platform and all associated information related to those
   Contacts (for example, email addresses).

   "Member" means any person or entity that is registered with us to use
   the Services.

   "Personal Information" means any information that identifies or can be
   used to identify a Member, a Contact, or a Visitor, directly or
   indirectly. Examples of Personal Information include, but are not
   limited to, first and last name, date of birth, email address, gender,
   occupation, or other demographic information.

   "Website(s)" means any website(s) we own and operate (such as
   www.mailchimp.com) or any web pages, interactive features,
   applications, widgets, blogs, social networks, social network "tabs,"
   or other online, mobile, or wireless offerings that post a link to this
   privacy policy.

   "Visitor" means any person who visits any of our Websites.

   "you" and "your" means, depending on the context, either a Member, a
   Contact, or a Visitor.

2. Privacy for Members

   This section applies to the Personal Information we collect and process
   from a Member or potential Member through the provision of the
   Services. If you are not a Member, the Visitors or Contacts section of
   this policy may be more applicable to you and your data. In this
   section, "you" and "your" refer to Members and potential Members.

A. Information We Collect

   The Personal Information that we may collect broadly falls into the
   following categories:

   (i) Information you provide to us: In the course of engaging with our
   Services, you may provide Personal Information about you and your
   Contacts. Personal Information is often, but not exclusively, provided
   to us when you sign up for and use the Services, consult with our
   customer service team, send us an email, integrate the Services with
   another website or service (for example, when you choose to connect
   your e-commerce account with Mailchimp), or communicate with us in any
   other way.

   We will let you know prior to collection whether the provision of
   Personal Information we are collecting is compulsory or if it may be
   provided on a voluntary basis and the consequences, if any, of not
   providing the information. By giving us this information, you agree to
   this information being collected, used and disclosed as described in
   our Terms of Use and in this privacy policy.

   This information may include:
     * Registration information: You need a Mailchimp account to use the
       Services as a Member. When you register for an account, you will be
       asked to provide certain basic information, such as your name,
       email address, username, password, company name, occupation,
       location, and phone number (for example, if you are using
       two-factor authentication).
     * Billing and communications information: If you purchase our
       Services, you may also need to provide us with payment and billing
       information, such as your credit card details and billing address.
       Mailchimp will also maintain a record of your billing transactions
       and purchases, and any communications and responses.
     * Information we process on your behalf: In order to send an email
       campaign or use certain features in your account, you need to
       upload a Distribution List that provides us information about your
       Contacts, such as their names and email addresses. We use and
       process this information to provide the Services in accordance with
       your instructions.

   (ii) Information we collect automatically: When you use the Services,
   we may automatically collect certain information about your device and
   usage of the Services. We use cookies and other tracking technologies
   to collect some of this information. Our use of cookies and other
   tracking technologies is discussed more below, and in more detail in
   our Cookie Statement here.

   This information may include:
     * Device information: We collect information about the device and
       applications you use to access the Services, such as your IP
       address, your operating system, your browser ID, and other
       information about your system and connection.
     * Log data: Our web servers keep log files that record data each time
       a device accesses those servers and those log files contain data
       about the nature of each access, including originating IP
       addresses. We may also access metadata and other information
       associated with files that you upload into our Services.
     * Product usage data: We collect usage data about you whenever you
       interact with our Services, which may include the dates and times
       you access the Services and your browsing activities (such as what
       portions of the Services are used). We also collect information
       regarding the performance of the Services, including metrics
       related to the deliverability of emails and other communications
       you send through the Services. This information allows us to
       improve the content and operation of the Services, and facilitate
       research and analysis of the Services.

   (iii) Information we collect from other sources: From time to time, we
   may obtain information about you or your Contacts from third-party
   sources, such as public databases, social media platforms, third-party
   data providers and our joint marketing partners. We take steps to
   ensure that such third parties are legally or contractually permitted
   to disclose such information to us.
     * Examples of the information we receive from other sources include
       demographic information (such as age and gender), device
       information (such as IP addresses), location (such as city and
       state), and online behavioral data (such as information about use
       of social media websites, page view information and search results
       and links). We use this information, alone or in combination with
       other information (including Personal Information) we collect, to
       enhance our ability to provide relevant marketing and content to
       you and to develop and provide you with more relevant products,
       features, and services.

   (iv) Information from the use of our mobile apps: When you use our
   mobile apps, we may collect certain device and usage-related
   information in addition to information described elsewhere in this
   privacy policy.
     * Device information: We may collect information about the type of
       device and operating system you use. We do not ask for, access, or
       track any location-based information from your mobile device at any
       time while downloading or using our mobile apps or Services.
     * Product usage data: We may use mobile analytics software (such as
       Fabric.io) to better understand how people use our application. We
       may collect information about how often you use the application and
       other performance data.

B. Use of Personal Information

   We may use the Personal Information we collect through the Services or
   other sources for a range of reasons, including:
     * To bill and collect money owed to us by you. This includes sending
       you emails, invoices, receipts, notices of delinquency, and
       alerting you if we need a different credit card number. We use
       third parties for secure credit card transaction processing, and
       those third parties collect billing information to process your
       orders and credit card payments. To learn more about the steps we
       take to safeguard that data, see the "Our Security" section of this
       privacy policy.
     * To send you system alert messages. For example, we may inform you
       about temporary or permanent changes to our Services, such as
       planned outages, or send you account, security or compliance
       notifications, such as new features, version updates, releases,
       abuse warnings, and changes to this privacy policy.
     * To communicate with you about your account and provide customer
       support. For example, if you use our mobile apps, we may ask you if
       you want to receive push notifications about activity in your
       account. If you have opted in to these push notifications and no
       longer want to receive them, you may turn them off through your
       operating system.
     * To enforce compliance with our Terms of Use and applicable law, and
       to protect the rights and safety of our Members and third parties,
       as well as our own. This may include developing tools and
       algorithms that help us prevent violations. For example, sometimes
       we review the content of our Members’ email campaigns to make sure
       they comply with our Terms of Use. To improve that process, we have
       software that helps us find email campaigns that may violate our
       Terms of Use. Our employees or independent contractors may review
       those particular email campaigns. This benefits all Members who
       comply with our Terms of Use because it reduces the amount of spam
       being sent through our servers and helps us maintain high
       deliverability. Email was not built for confidential information.
       Please do not use Mailchimp to send confidential information.
     * To meet legal requirements, including complying with court orders,
       valid discovery requests, valid subpoenas, and other appropriate
       legal mechanisms.
     * To provide information to representatives and advisors, including
       attorneys and accountants, to help us comply with legal,
       accounting, or security requirements.
     * To prosecute and defend a court, arbitration, or similar legal
       proceeding.
     * To respond to lawful requests by public authorities, including to
       meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
     * To provide, support and improve the Services. For example, this may
       include sharing your or your Contacts’ information with third
       parties in order to provide and support our Services or to make
       certain features of the Services available to you. When we share
       Personal Information with third parties, we take steps to protect
       your information by requiring these third parties to enter into a
       contract with us that requires them to use the Personal Information
       we transfer to them in a manner that is consistent with this
       privacy policy and applicable privacy laws.
     * To provide suggestions to you. This includes adding features that
       compare Members’ email campaigns, using data to suggest other
       publishers your Contacts may be interested in, or using data to
       suggest products or services that you may be interested in or that
       may be relevant to you or your Contacts. Some of these suggestions
       are generated by use of our data analytics projects, which are
       described below. For more information about our use of cookies and
       other tracking technologies for this purpose, and instructions
       about how to opt out of having data collected through the use of
       cookies, please see our Cookie Statement here.
     * For our data analytics projects. Our data analytics projects use
       data from Mailchimp accounts, including Personal Information of
       Contacts, to provide and improve the Services. We use information
       like your sending habits and your Contacts’ details and purchase
       history, so we can make more informed predictions, decisions, and
       products for our Members. If you or your Contact prefers not to
       share this data, you can alter the security settings on your
       account (as described here) to opt out of data analytics projects,
       or your Contact can opt out of data analytics projects at any time
       by emailing us at personaldatarequests@mailchimp.com. For example,
       we use data from Mailchimp accounts to enable product
       recommendation, audience segmentation, and predicted demographics
       features for our Members. We will act as a data controller to
       process data for our data analytics projects in reliance on our
       legitimate business interests of improving and enhancing our
       products and services for our Members. As always, we take the
       privacy of Personal Information seriously, and will continue to
       implement appropriate safeguards to protect this Personal
       Information from misuse or unauthorized disclosure.
     * Combined information. We may combine Personal Information with
       other information we collect or obtain about you (such as
       information we source from our third-party partners) to serve you
       specifically, such as to deliver a product or service according to
       your preferences or restrictions, or for advertising or targeting
       purposes in accordance with this privacy policy. When we combine
       Personal Information with other information in this way, we treat
       it as, and apply all of the safeguards in this privacy policy
       applicable to, Personal Information.
     * Other purposes. To carry out other legitimate business purposes, as
       well as other lawful purposes about which we will notify you.

C. Cookies and Tracking Technologies

   We and our partners may use various technologies to collect and store
   information when you use our Services, and this may include using
   cookies and similar tracking technologies, such as pixels and web
   beacons. For example, we use web beacons in the emails we send on your
   behalf. These web beacons track certain behavior such as whether the
   email sent through the Services was delivered and opened and whether
   links within the email were clicked. They also allow us to collect
   information such as the recipient’s IP address, browser, email client
   type and other similar details. We use this information to measure the
   performance of your email campaigns, and to provide analytics
   information and enhance the effectiveness of our Services. Reports are
   also available to us when we send email to you, so we may collect and
   review that information.

   Our use of cookies and other tracking technologies is discussed in more
   detail in our Cookie Statement here.

D. Member Distribution Lists

   A Distribution List can be created in a number of ways, including by
   importing Contacts, such as through a CSV or directly from your email
   client. Your Distribution Lists are stored on a secure Mailchimp
   server. We do not, under any circumstances, sell your Distribution
   Lists. If someone on your Distribution List complains or contacts us,
   we might then contact that person. You may export (download) your
   Distribution Lists from Mailchimp at any time.

   If we detect abusive or illegal behavior related to your Distribution
   List, we may share your Distribution List or portions of it with
   affected ISPs or anti-spam organizations to the extent permitted or
   required by applicable law.

   If a Contact chooses to use the Forward to a Friend (FTF) link in an
   email campaign a Member sends, it will allow the Contact to share the
   Member’s email content with individuals not on the Member’s
   Distribution List. When a Contact forwards an email to a friend, we do
   not store the Contact’s email address or their friend’s email address,
   and no one is added to any Distribution List as a result of the FTF
   link. The Member who created the email campaign only sees an aggregate
   number of times their email campaign was forwarded by a Contact and
   does not have access to the email addresses used to share or receive
   that forwarded content.

E. Other Data Protection Rights

   You and your Contacts may have the following data protection rights:
     * To access, correct, update or request deletion of Personal
       Information. Mailchimp takes reasonable steps to ensure that the
       data we collect is reliable for its intended use, accurate,
       complete and up to date. As a Member, you can manage many of your
       individual account and profile settings within the dashboard
       provided through the Mailchimp platform, or you may contact us
       directly by emailing us at personaldatarequests@mailchimp.com. You
       can also manage information about your Contacts within the
       dashboard provided through the Mailchimp platform to assist you
       with responding to requests to access, correct, update or delete
       information that you receive from your Contacts.
     * In addition, individuals who are residents of the EEA can object to
       processing of their Personal Information, ask to restrict
       processing of their Personal Information or request portability of
       their Personal Information. You can exercise these rights by
       contacting us using the contact details provided in the "Questions
       and Concerns" section below. If any of your Contacts wishes to
       exercise any of these rights, they should contact you directly, or
       contact us as described in the "Privacy for Contacts" section
       below.
     * Similarly, if Personal Information is collected or processed on the
       basis of consent, the data subject can withdraw their consent at
       any time. Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness
       of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will
       it affect processing of your Personal Information conducted in
       reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent. If you
       receive these requests from Contacts, you can segment your lists
       within the Mailchimp platform to ensure that you only market to
       Contacts who have not opted out of receiving such marketing.
     * The right to complain to a data protection authority about the
       collection and use of Personal Information. For more information,
       please contact your local data protection authority. Contact
       details for data protection authorities in the EEA are available
       here.

   We respond to all requests we receive from individuals wishing to
   exercise their data protection rights in accordance with applicable
   data protection law. We may ask you to verify your identity in order to
   help us respond efficiently to your request. If we receive a request
   from one of your Contacts, we will either direct the Contact to reach
   out to you, or, if appropriate, we may respond directly to their
   request.

3. Privacy for Contacts

   This section applies to the information we process about our Members’
   Contacts as a data controller pursuant to our legitimate business
   interests, as explained in the "Legal Basis for Processing" section
   below. Our Services are intended for use by our Members. As a result,
   for much of the Personal Information we collect and process about
   Contacts through the Services, we act as a processor on behalf of our
   Members. Mailchimp is not responsible for the privacy or security
   practices of our Members, which may differ from those set forth in this
   privacy policy. Please check with individual Members about the policies
   they have in place. For purposes of this section, "you" and "your"
   refer to Contacts.

A. Information We Collect

   The Personal Information that we may collect or receive about you
   broadly falls into the following categories:

   (i) Information we receive about Contacts from our Members: A Member
   may provide Personal Information about you to us through the Services.
   For example, when a Member uploads their Distribution List or
   integrates the Services with another website or service (for example,
   when a Member chooses to connect their e-commerce account with
   Mailchimp), or when you sign up for a Member’s Distribution List on a
   Mailchimp signup form, they may provide us with certain contact
   information or other Personal Information about you such as your name,
   email address, address or telephone number. You may have the
   opportunity to update some of this information by electing to update or
   manage your preferences via an email you receive from a Member.

   (ii) Information we collect automatically: When you interact with an
   email campaign that you receive from a Member or browse or purchase
   from a Member’s connected store, we may collect information about your
   device and interaction with an email. We use cookies and other tracking
   technologies to collect some of this information. Our use of cookies
   and other tracking technologies is discussed more below, and in more
   detail in our Cookie Statement here.
     * Device information: We collect information about the device and
       applications you use to access emails sent through our Services,
       such as your IP address, your operating system, your browser ID,
       and other information about your system and connection.
     * Product usage data: We collect usage data about you whenever you
       interact with emails sent through the Services, which may include
       dates and times you access emails and your browsing activities
       (such as what pages are viewed). We also collect information
       regarding the performance of the Services, including metrics
       related to the deliverability of emails and other electronic
       communications our Members send through the Services. This
       information allows us to improve the content and operation of the
       Services, and facilitate research and analysis of the Services.

   (iii) Information we collect from other sources: From time to time, we
   may obtain information about you from third-party sources, such as
   social media platforms and third-party data providers. We take steps to
   ensure that such third parties are legally or contractually permitted
   to disclose such information to us, and we use this information to
   provide publicly available social media information about you to
   Members who have enabled the "Social Profiles" feature in their
   Mailchimp accounts.

B. Use of Personal Information

   We may use the Personal Information we collect or receive about you for
   our legitimate business interests, including:
     * To enforce compliance with our Terms of Use and applicable law.
       This may include developing tools and algorithms that help us
       prevent violations.
     * To protect the rights and safety of our Members and third parties,
       as well as our own. For example, sometimes we review the content of
       our Members’ email campaigns to make sure they comply with our
       Terms of Use. To improve that process, we have software that helps
       us find email campaigns that may violate our Terms of Use. Our
       employees or independent contractors may review those particular
       email campaigns, which may include your contact information. This
       reduces the amount of spam being sent through our servers and helps
       us maintain high deliverability.
     * To meet legal requirements, including complying with court orders,
       valid discovery requests, valid subpoenas, and other appropriate
       legal mechanisms.
     * To provide information to representatives and advisors, including
       attorneys and accountants, to help us comply with legal,
       accounting, or security requirements.
     * To prosecute and defend a court, arbitration, or similar legal
       proceeding.
     * To respond to lawful requests by public authorities, including to
       meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
     * To provide, support and improve the Services. For example, this may
       include sharing your information with third parties in order to
       provide and support our Services or to make certain features of the
       Services available to our Members. When we share Personal
       Information with third parties, we take steps to protect your
       information by requiring these third parties to enter into a
       contract with us that requires them to use the Personal Information
       we transfer to them in a manner that is consistent with this
       privacy policy and applicable privacy laws.
     * For our data analytics projects. Our data analytics projects use
       data from Mailchimp accounts, including your Personal Information,
       to provide and improve the Services. We use information, like your
       purchase history, provided to us by Members, so we can make more
       informed predictions, decisions, and products for our Members. For
       example, we use data from Mailchimp accounts to enable product
       recommendation, audience segmentation, and predicted demographics
       features for our Members. If you prefer not to share this data, you
       can opt out of data analytics projects at any time by emailing us
       at personaldatarequests@mailchimp.com.
     * Other purposes. To carry out other legitimate business purposes, as
       well as other lawful purposes.

C. Cookies and Tracking Technologies

   We and our partners may use various technologies to collect and store
   information when you interact with a Member’s email campaign or
   connected store, and this may include using cookies and similar
   tracking technologies, such as pixels and web beacons. For example, we
   use web beacons in the emails we send on behalf of our Members. When
   you receive and engage with a Member’s campaign, web beacons track
   certain behavior such as whether the email sent through the Mailchimp
   platform was delivered and opened and whether links within the email
   were clicked. They also allow us to collect information such as your IP
   address, browser, email client type, and other similar details. We use
   this information to measure the performance of our Members’ email
   campaigns, and to provide analytics information and enhance the
   effectiveness of our Services.

   Our use of cookies and other tracking technologies is discussed in more
   detail in our Cookie Statement here.

D. Legal Basis for Processing

   We process Personal Information about you as a data controller as
   described in this section, where such processing is in our legitimate
   interests and not overridden by your data protection interests or
   fundamental rights and freedoms. Our legitimate interests typically
   include: improving, maintaining, providing, and enhancing our
   technology, products and services; and ensuring the security of the
   Services and our Website.

E. Other Data Protection Rights

   You may have the following data protection rights:
     * To access, correct, update or request deletion of your Personal
       Information. Mailchimp takes reasonable steps to ensure that the
       data we collect is reliable for its intended use, accurate,
       complete, and up to date. You may contact us directly at any time
       about accessing, correcting, updating or deleting your Personal
       Information, or altering your data, by submitting a request to us
       here. We will consider your request in accordance with applicable
       laws.
     * In addition, if you are a resident of the EEA, you can object to
       processing of your Personal Information, ask us to restrict
       processing of your Personal Information or request portability of
       your Personal Information. Again, you can exercise these rights by
       emailing us at personaldatarequests@mailchimp.com.
     * You have the right to complain to a data protection authority about
       our collection and use of your Personal Information. For more
       information, please contact your local data protection authority.
       Contact details for data protection authorities in the EEA are
       available here.

   As described above, for much of the Personal Information we collect and
   process about Contacts through the Services, we act as a processor on
   behalf of our Members. In such cases, if you are a Contact and want to
   exercise any data protection rights that may be available to you under
   applicable law or have questions or concerns about how your Personal
   Information is handled by Mailchimp as a processor on behalf of our
   individual Members, you should contact the relevant Member that is
   using the Mailchimp Services, and refer to their separate privacy
   policies.

   If you no longer want to be contacted by one of our Members through our
   Services, please unsubscribe directly from that Member’s newsletter or
   contact the Member directly to update or delete your data. If you
   contact us directly, we may remove or update your information within a
   reasonable time and after providing notice to the Member of your
   request.

   We respond to all requests we receive from individuals wishing to
   exercise their data protection rights in accordance with applicable
   data protection laws. We may ask you to verify your identity in order
   to help us respond efficiently to your request.

4. Privacy for Visitors

   This section applies to Personal Information that we collect and
   process through our Websites and in the usual course of our business,
   such as in connection with our recruitment, events, sales and marketing
   activities. In this section "you" and "your" refers to Visitors.

A. Information We Collect

   (i) Information you provide to us on the Websites or otherwise: Certain
   parts of our Websites may ask you to provide Personal Information
   voluntarily. For example, we may ask you to provide certain Personal
   Information (such as your name, contact details, company name, profile
   information) in order to sign up for a free or paid Mailchimp account,
   apply for a role with Mailchimp, or otherwise submit inquiries to us.
   We may also collect Personal Information, such as your contact and job
   details and feedback, when you attend our events, take part in surveys,
   or through other business or marketing interactions we may have with
   you. You may choose to provide additional information when you
   communicate with us or otherwise interact with us, and we will keep
   copies of any such communications for our records.

   The Personal Information that you are asked to provide, and the reasons
   why you are asked to provide it, will be made clear to you at the point
   we ask you to provide your Personal Information. We will also let you
   know prior to collection whether the provision of the Personal
   Information we are collecting is compulsory or may be provided on a
   voluntary basis and the consequences, if any, of not providing the
   information.

   (ii) Information we collect automatically through the Websites: When
   you visit our Websites, we may also collect certain information
   automatically from your device. In some countries, including countries
   in the European Economic Area, this information may be considered
   Personal Information under applicable data protection laws.

   Specifically, the information we collect automatically may include your
   IP address, your operating system, your browser ID, your browsing
   activity, and other information about your system and connection and
   how you interact with our Websites and other websites. We may collect
   this information as a part of log files as well as through the use of
   cookies or other tracking technologies. Our use of cookies and other
   tracking technologies is discussed more below, and in more detail in
   our Cookie Statement here.

B. Use of Personal Information

   We may use the information we collect through our Websites for a range
   of reasons, including:
     * To provide, operate, optimize, and maintain our Websites.
     * To send you information for marketing purposes, in accordance with
       your marketing preferences.
     * For recruitment purposes if you have applied for a role with
       Mailchimp.
     * To respond to your online inquiries and requests, and to provide
       you with information and access to resources or services that you
       have requested from us.
     * To manage our Websites and system administration and security.
     * To improve the navigation and content of our Websites.
     * To identify any server problems or other IT or network issues.
     * To process transactions and to set up online accounts.
     * To compile aggregated statistics about site usage and to better
       understand the preferences of our Visitors.
     * To carry out research and development to improve our products and
       services.
     * To customize content and layout of the Websites.
     * To carry out other legitimate business purposes, as well as other
       lawful purposes.

   In addition, we may combine Personal Information with other information
   we collect or obtain about you (such as information we source from our
   third-party partners) to serve you specifically, such as to deliver a
   product or service according to your preferences or restrictions, or
   for advertising or targeting purposes in accordance with this privacy
   policy. When we combine Personal Information with other information in
   this way, we treat it as, and apply all of the safeguards in this
   privacy policy applicable to, Personal Information.

C. Public Information and Third-Party Websites

     * Blog. We have public blogs on our Websites. Any information you
       include in a comment on our blog may be read, collected, and used
       by anyone. If your Personal Information appears on our blogs and
       you want it removed, contact us here. If we are unable to remove
       your information, we will tell you why.
     * Social media platforms and widgets. Our Websites include social
       media features, such as the Facebook Like button. These features
       may collect information about your IP address and which page you
       are visiting on our Website, and they may set a cookie to make sure
       the feature functions properly. Social media features and widgets
       are either hosted by a third party or hosted directly on our
       Website. We also maintain presences on social media platforms,
       including Facebook, Twitter, and Instagram. Any information,
       communications, or materials you submit to us via a social media
       platform is done at your own risk without any expectation of
       privacy. We cannot control the actions of other users of these
       platforms or the actions of the platforms themselves. Your
       interactions with those features and platforms are governed by the
       privacy policies of the companies that provide them.
     * Links to third-party websites. Our Websites include links to other
       websites, whose privacy practices may be different from ours. If
       you submit Personal Information to any of those sites, your
       information is governed by their privacy policies. We encourage you
       to carefully read the privacy policy of any website you visit.
     * Contests and sweepstakes. We may, from time to time, offer surveys,
       contests, sweepstakes, or other promotions on our Websites or
       through social media (collectively, "Promotions"). Participation in
       our Promotions is completely voluntary. Information requested for
       entry may include Personal Information such as your name, address,
       date of birth, phone number, email address, username, and similar
       details. We use the information you provide to administer our
       Promotions. We may also, unless prohibited by the Promotion’s rules
       or law, use the information provided to communicate with you, or
       other people you select, about our Services. We may share this
       information with our affiliates and other organizations or service
       providers in line with this privacy policy and the rules posted for
       our Promotions.

D. Cookies and Tracking Technologies

   We use cookies and similar tracking technologies to collect and use
   Personal Information about you, including to serve interest-based
   advertising. For further information about the types of cookies and
   tracking technologies we use, why, and how you can control them, please
   see our Cookie Statement here.

E. Other Data Protection Rights

   You have the following data protection rights:
     * To access, correct, update, or request deletion of your Personal
       Information. Mailchimp takes reasonable steps to ensure that the
       data we collect is reliable for its intended use, accurate,
       complete, and up to date. You may contact us directly at any time
       about accessing, correcting, updating, or deleting your Personal
       Information, or altering your data or marketing preferences by
       emailing us at personaldatarequests@mailchimp.com. We will consider
       your request in accordance with applicable laws.
     * In addition, if you are a resident of the EEA, you can object to
       processing of your Personal Information, ask us to restrict
       processing of your Personal Information or request portability of
       your Personal Information. Again, you can exercise these rights by
       emailing us at personaldatarequests@mailchimp.com.
     * Similarly, if we have collected and processed your Personal
       Information with your consent, then you can withdraw your consent
       at any time. Withdrawing your consent will not affect the
       lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal,
       nor will it affect processing of your Personal Information
       conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than
       consent.
     * You have the right to complain to a data protection authority about
       our collection and use of your Personal Information. For more
       information, please contact your local data protection authority.
       Contact details for data protection authorities in the EEA are
       available here.

   We respond to all requests we receive from individuals wishing to
   exercise their data protection rights in accordance with applicable
   data protection laws. We may ask you to verify your identity in order
   to help us respond efficiently to your request.

5. General Information

A. How We Share Information

   We may share and disclose your Personal Information to the following
   types of third parties for the purposes described in this privacy
   policy (for purposes of this section, "you" and "your" refer to
   Members, Contacts, and Visitors unless otherwise indicated):

   (i) Our service providers: Sometimes, we share your information with
   our third-party service providers, who help us provide and support our
   Services and other business-related functions.

   For example, if it is necessary to provide Members something they have
   requested (like enable a feature such as Social Profiles), then we may
   share Members’ or Contacts’ Personal Information with a service
   provider for that purpose. Other examples include analyzing data,
   hosting data, engaging technical support for our Services, processing
   payments, and delivering content.

   These third-party service providers enter into a contract that requires
   them to use your Personal Information only for the provision of
   services to us and in a manner that is consistent with this privacy
   policy.

   In connection with our Services, we use a third-party service provider,
   Twilio, Inc. We use Twilio's API, which allows us to build features
   into our Mailchimp application to enable us to communicate with our
   Members through texting and calling, and their "Authy" product, which
   we use for two-factor authentication for our application. If you are a
   Member, Twilio may need to collect and process certain Personal
   Information about you as a controller to provide such services. To
   learn more about Twilio's privacy practices, please visit
   https://www.twilio.com/legal/privacy.

   (ii) Advertising partners: We may partner with third-party advertising
   networks and exchanges to display advertising on our Websites or to
   manage and serve our advertising on other sites and may share Personal
   Information of Members and Visitors with them for this purpose. We do
   not sell or market to any of our Members’ Contacts. We and our
   third-party partners may use cookies and other tracking technologies,
   such as pixels and web beacons, to gather information about your
   activities on our Websites and other sites in order to provide you with
   targeted advertising based on your browsing activities and interests.
   For more information about cookies and other tracking technologies,
   please see our Cookie Statement here.

   (iii) Any competent law enforcement body, regulatory body, government
   agency, court or other third party where we believe disclosure is
   necessary (a) as a matter of applicable law or regulation, (b) to
   exercise, establish, or defend our legal rights, or (c) to protect your
   vital interests or those of any other person.

   (iv) A potential buyer (and its agents and advisors) in the case of a
   sale, merger, consolidation, liquidation, reorganization, or
   acquisition. In that event, any acquirer will be subject to our
   obligations under this privacy policy, including your rights to access
   and choice. We will notify you of the change either by sending you an
   email or posting a notice on our Website.

   (v) Any other person with your consent.

B. Legal Basis for Processing Personal Information (EEA Persons Only)

   If you are from the European Economic Area, our legal basis for
   collecting and using the Personal Information described above will
   depend on the Personal Information concerned and the specific context
   in which we collect it.

   However, we will normally collect and use Personal Information from you
   where the processing is in our legitimate interests and not overridden
   by your data-protection interests or fundamental rights and freedoms.
   Typically, our legitimate interests include improving, maintaining,
   providing, and enhancing our technology, products, and services;
   ensuring the security of the Services and our Websites; and for our
   marketing activities.

   If you are a Member, we may need the Personal Information to perform a
   contract with you. In some limited cases, we may also have a legal
   obligation to collect Personal Information from you.

   If we ask you to provide Personal Information to comply with a legal
   requirement or to perform a contact with you, we will make this clear
   at the relevant time and advise you whether the provision of your
   Personal Information is mandatory or not, as well as of the possible
   consequences if you do not provide your Personal Information.

   Where required by law, we will collect Personal Information only where
   we have your consent to do so.

   If you have questions about or need further information concerning the
   legal basis on which we collect and use your Personal Information,
   please contact us using the contact details provided in the "Questions
   and Concerns" section below.

C. Your Choices and Opt-Outs

   Members and Visitors who have opted in to our marketing emails can opt
   out of receiving marketing emails from us at any time by clicking the
   "unsubscribe" link at the bottom of our marketing messages.

   Also, all opt-out requests can be made by emailing us using the contact
   details provided in the "Questions and Concerns" section below. Please
   note that some communications (such as service messages, account
   notifications, billing information) are considered transactional and
   necessary for account management, and Members cannot opt out of these
   messages unless you cancel your Mailchimp account.

D. Our Security

   We take appropriate and reasonable technical and organizational
   measures to protect Personal Information from loss, misuse,
   unauthorized access, disclosure, alteration, and destruction, taking
   into account the risks involved in the processing and the nature of the
   Personal Information. For further information about our security
   practices, please see our Security page here. If you have any questions
   about the security of your Personal Information, you may contact us at
   privacy@mailchimp.com.

   Mailchimp accounts require a username and password to log in. Members
   must keep their username and password secure, and never disclose it to
   a third party. Because the information in a Member’s Mailchimp account
   is so sensitive, account passwords are hashed, which means we cannot
   see a Member’s password. We cannot resend forgotten passwords either.
   We will only provide Members with instructions on how to reset them.

E. International Transfers

   (i) We operate in the United States

   Our servers and offices are located in the United States, so your
   information may be transferred to, stored, or processed in the United
   States. While the data protection, privacy, and other laws of the
   United States might not be as comprehensive as those in your country,
   we take many steps to protect your privacy, including offering our
   Members a Data Processing Agreement.

   (ii) Data transfers from Switzerland or the EU to the United States

   Mailchimp participates in and has certified its compliance with the
   EU-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework and the Swiss-U.S. Privacy Shield
   Framework. We are committed to subjecting all Personal Information
   received from European Union (EU) member countries and Switzerland,
   respectively, in reliance on each Privacy Shield Framework, to each
   Framework’s applicable Principles. To learn more about the Privacy
   Shield Frameworks, and to view our certification, visit the U.S.
   Department of Commerce’s Privacy Shield website, here.

   A list of Privacy Shield participants is maintained by the Department
   of Commerce and is available here.

   Mailchimp is responsible for the processing of Personal Information we
   receive under each Privacy Shield Framework and subsequently transfer
   to a third party acting as an agent on our behalf. We comply with the
   Privacy Shield Principles for all onward transfers of Personal
   Information from the EU and Switzerland, including the onward transfer
   liability provisions.

   With respect to Personal Information received or transferred pursuant
   to the Privacy Shield Frameworks, we are subject to the regulatory
   enforcement powers of the U.S. Federal Trade Commission. In certain
   situations, we may be required to disclose Personal Information in
   response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet
   national security or law enforcement requirements.

   If you have an unresolved privacy or data use concern that we have not
   addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third-party
   dispute resolution provider (free of charge to you) at
   https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request. Under certain
   conditions, more fully described on the Privacy Shield website, here,
   you may be entitled to invoke binding arbitration when other dispute
   resolution procedures have been exhausted.

   Members located in Switzerland and the EU are subject to our Data
   Processing Addendum, as described in our Terms of Use.

   (iii) Members located in Australia

   If you are a Member who lives in Australia, this section applies to
   you. We are subject to the operation of the Privacy Act 1988
   ("Australian Privacy Act"). Here are the specific points you should be
   aware of:
     * Where we say we assume an obligation about Personal Information, we
       are also requiring our subcontractors to undertake a similar
       obligation, where relevant.
     * We will not use or disclose Personal Information for the purpose of
       our direct marketing to you unless you have consented to receive
       direct marketing; you would reasonably expect us to use your
       personal details for the marketing; or we believe you may be
       interested in the material but it is impractical for us to obtain
       your consent. You may opt out of any marketing materials we send to
       you through an unsubscribe mechanism or by contacting us directly.
       If you have requested not to receive further direct marketing
       messages, we may continue to provide you with messages that are not
       regarded as "direct marketing" under the Australian Privacy Act,
       including changes to our terms, system alerts, and other
       information related to your account.
     * Our servers are located in the United States. In addition, we or
       our subcontractors may use cloud technology to store or process
       Personal Information, which may result in storage of data outside
       Australia. It is not practicable for us to specify in advance which
       country will have jurisdiction over this type of offshore activity.
       All of our subcontractors, however, are required to comply with the
       Australian Privacy Act in relation to the transfer or storage of
       Personal Information overseas.
     * If you think the information we hold about you is inaccurate, out
       of date, incomplete, irrelevant, or misleading, we will take
       reasonable steps, consistent with our obligations under the
       Australian Privacy Act, to correct that information upon your
       request.
     * If you are unsatisfied with our response to a privacy matter then
       you may consult either an independent advisor or contact the Office
       of the Australian Information Commissioner for additional help. We
       will provide our full cooperation if you pursue this course of
       action.

F. Retention of Data

   We retain Personal Information where we have an ongoing legitimate
   business or legal need to do so. Our retention periods will vary
   depending on the type of data involved, but, generally, we'll refer to
   these criteria in order to determine retention period:
     * Whether we have a legal or contractual need to retain the data.
     * Whether the data is necessary to provide our Services.
     * Whether our Members have the ability to access and delete the data
       within their Mailchimp accounts.
     * Whether our Members would reasonably expect that we would retain
       the data until they remove it or until their Mailchimp accounts are
       closed or terminated.

   When we have no ongoing legitimate business need to process your
   Personal Information, we will either delete or anonymize it or, if this
   is not possible (for example, because your Personal Information has
   been stored in backup archives), then we will securely store your
   Personal Information and isolate it from any further processing until
   deletion is possible.

G. California Privacy

   Under California Law, California residents have the right to request in
   writing from businesses with whom they have an established business
   relationship, (a) a list of the categories of Personal Information,
   such as name, email, and mailing address, and the type of services
   provided to the customer that a business has disclosed to third parties
   (including affiliates that are separate legal entities) during the
   immediately preceding calendar year for the third-parties’ direct
   marketing purposes, and (b) the names and addresses of all such third
   parties. To request the above information, please contact us through
   our contact form or email us at privacy@mailchimp.com.

H. Changes to this Policy

   We may change this privacy policy at any time and from time to time.
   The most recent version of the privacy policy is reflected by the
   version date located at the top of this privacy policy. All updates and
   amendments are effective immediately upon notice, which we may give by
   any means, including, but not limited to, by posting a revised version
   of this privacy policy or other notice on the Websites. We encourage
   you to review this privacy policy often to stay informed of changes
   that may affect you. Our electronically or otherwise properly stored
   copies of this privacy policy are each deemed to be the true, complete,
   valid, authentic, and enforceable copy of the version of this privacy
   policy that was in effect on each respective date you visited the
   Website.

I. Questions & Concerns

   If you have any questions or comments, or if you have a concern about
   the way in which we have handled any privacy matter, please use our
   contact form to send us a message. You may also contact us by postal
   mail or email at:

   For EEA Residents:

   For the purposes of EU data protection legislation, The Rocket Science
   Group LLC d/b/a Mailchimp is the controller of your Personal
   Information. Our Data Protection Officer can be contacted at
   dpo@mailchimp.com.

   For Non-EEA Residents:

   The Rocket Science Group LLC d/b/a Mailchimp
   Attn. Privacy Officer
   privacy@mailchimp.com
   675 Ponce de Leon Ave NE, Suite 5000
   Atlanta, GA 30308 USA

Mailchimp Presents

   Illustration of a young, African American girl with her back to us.
   Large eyes are glaring at her in judgement, invoking the sense that she
   does not fit in.

   A collection of short-form series, films, and podcasts created with
   entrepreneurs in mind. Now playing: Outer Monologue, an inspiring new
   animated series from Mailchimp.
   Learn more

Company

     * Our Story
     * Careers
     * Contact
     * Newsroom

Product

     * Email
     * Mobile App
     * Help
     * Developers
     * Status
     * Security
     * What's New

Community

     * Partner Program
     * Experts Directory
     * Integrations Directory
     * Agencies
     * Events
     * Marketing Glossary

     * Facebook
     * Twitter
     * Instagram
     * LinkedIn
     * YouTube

     * [KB]
     * Get it on Google Play

   ©2001-2019 All Rights Reserved. Mailchimp® is a registered trademark of
   The Rocket Science Group. Apple and the Apple logo are trademarks of
   Apple Inc., registered in the U.S. and other countries. Mac App Store
   is a service mark of Apple Inc. Google Play and the Google Play logo
   are trademarks of Google Inc. Privacy & Terms
   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate
   alternate alternate alternate

   Skip to main content
     * Why Mailchimp?
     * Marketing Platform
          + Illustration of stars and planets Overview
            All the tools you need to market smarter and grow faster.
          + Illustration of a finger tip puppet Audience
               o Marketing CRM
               o Audience Dashboard
               o Tags
               o Segmentation
               o Lookalike Audiences
               o Address Finder
          + Brand
               o Content Studio
               o Templates
          + Layered squares stacked Campaigns
               o Email
               o Social Media
               o Landing Pages
               o Digital Ads
               o Postcards
               o Automations
          + Illustration of a magnifying glass Insights
               o Reports & Analytics
               o Smart Recommendations
               o Integrations
     * Pricing
     * Resources
          + Overview
          + Mailchimp 101
            Everything you need to get started
          + Marketing Tips
            Learn how to master marketing
          + Guides & Tutorials
            Get step-by-step help with Mailchimp
          + MCP - Illustration Mailchimp Presents
            Entertainment made for entrepreneurs

     *
     * Search ____________________ (BUTTON)
     *
     * Log In
     * Sign Up Free
     * Log In
     * Sign Up Free
     *
          + Audience
          + Dashboard
          + Campaigns
          + Reports
          + Account
          + Log In

   (BUTTON)

What you can do with Mailchimp

   Gif of a hand with a finger puppet

Put your audience first

   Know who you’re talking to so you can say the right things.
   Learn more
   Gif of a pencil drawing a building

Bring your brand to life

   Look like a pro with elegant, easy-to-use design tools.
   Learn more
   gif of three connecting squares

Create integrated campaigns

   Spread the word with social, email, ads, and more.
   Learn more
   gif of a magnifying glass

Turn data into insights

   Our recommendations get smarter as you go.
   Learn more

A marketing platform for your business

     *

E‑commerce
   A person stands on top of a variety of shapes, while onlookers look up,
       very impressed
       Our marketing platform helps you find new customers, build stronger
       relationships, and boost sales through deeper customer insights.
       Learn more
     *

Mobile and web apps
   People holding up a six point star
       Reach new customers, send personalized behavior‑based campaigns,
       and increase engagement with your app.
       Learn more
     *

Startups
       Find product‑market fit, learn from user feedback, and launch your
       first marketing campaigns.
       Learn more

   A person stands on top of a variety of shapes, while onlookers look up,
   very impressed People holding up a six point star

   Daisy Downs, co-founder and VP of Brand at Urbansitter, smiles to
   someone off camera.

“With Mailchimp’s help, we’ve scaled our business nationally with one million
members and counting.”

   Daisy Downs, Co-Founder of UrbanSitter
   Learn More

Organic Social Posting

Introducing Organic Social Posting in Mailchimp

   Create and share social posts to engage people across Facebook,
   Instagram, and Twitter in a few quick clicks.

4 Tips for Getting a Head Start on Your Holiday Marketing

   Learn how early planning will help you lay the groundwork for a
   successful holiday season.

   World Art West's Executive Director Julie Mushe and Marketing and
   Communications Director Terry Conway

Targeting Smarter with Tags and Segments

   World Arts West uses tags and segments to make sure they're sharing
   content that matters to their different audiences.

You’ll be in good company

   East Fork
   Chronicle Books
   Fader
   Sweat
   Magnolia Bakery New York City

It’s easy to get started

   And it's free. Two things everyone loves.
   Pick A Plan
     __________________________________________________________________

Mailchimp Presents

   Illustration of a young, African American girl with her back to us.
   Large eyes are glaring at her in judgement, invoking the sense that she
   does not fit in.

   A collection of short-form series, films, and podcasts created with
   entrepreneurs in mind. Now playing: Outer Monologue, an inspiring new
   animated series from Mailchimp.
   Learn more

Company

     * Our Story
     * Careers
     * Contact
     * Newsroom

Product

     * Email
     * Mobile App
     * Help
     * Developers
     * Status
     * Security
     * What's New

Community

     * Partner Program
     * Experts Directory
     * Integrations Directory
     * Agencies
     * Events
     * Marketing Glossary

     * Facebook
     * Twitter
     * Instagram
     * LinkedIn
     * YouTube

     * [KB]
     * Get it on Google Play

   ©2001-2019 All Rights Reserved. Mailchimp® is a registered trademark of
   The Rocket Science Group. Apple and the Apple logo are trademarks of
   Apple Inc., registered in the U.S. and other countries. Mac App Store
   is a service mark of Apple Inc. Google Play and the Google Play logo
   are trademarks of Google Inc. Privacy & Terms
   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-MCZTKL

   This app works best with JavaScript enabled.

   Jump to content
   Introducing Mailchimp Presents - Short-form series, films, and podcasts
   created with entrepreneurs in mind. My Dear Kyrgyzstan - A Kyrgyz man
   attempts to transform his village into a tourism destination. Outer
   Monologue - An animated series exploring the narratives running through
   creative minds.
   Trailer

Introducing Mailchimp Presents

Short-form series, films, and podcasts created with entrepreneurs in mind.

   documentary

My Dear Kyrgyzstan

A Kyrgyz man attempts to transform his village into a tourism destination.

   series

Outer Monologue

An animated series exploring the narratives running through creative minds.

     * (BUTTON) 1
     * (BUTTON) 2
     * (BUTTON) 3

   Trailer

Introducing Mailchimp Presents

Short-form series, films, and podcasts created with entrepreneurs in mind.

   (BUTTON) (BUTTON) (BUTTON)

All Shows

   documentary

   The award-winning true story of Jay Wilde, a beef farmer and vegan.
   documentary
   podcast
   Going Through It

   A podcast hosted by Ann Friedman about deciding whether or not to quit.
   podcast
   documentary

   This is the story of the zine that changed Bay Area photography
   forever.
   documentary
   documentary

   A Kyrgyz man attempts to transform his village into a tourism
   destination.
   documentary
   series

   An animated series exploring the narratives running through creative
   minds.
   series
   series

   Second Act follows five people who’ve chosen a new direction in their
   careers.
   series
   series

   A scripted series about a small and quirky stock photography company.
   series
   podcast
   The Jump

   Shirley Manson talks with musicians about that one song that changed
   everything.
   podcast
   series

   A mockumentary exploring the hilarious, high-stakes world of trade
   shows.
   series
   series

   A docu-series featuring entrepreneurial advice from unexpected sources.
   series
   series

   A docu-series about a global community of people who work from their
   laptops.
   series
   podcast

The Jump

Introducing The Jump, a new podcast from Mailchimp. Available wherever you
get your podcasts.

   A collection of original content that celebrates the entrepreneurial
   spirit.

Sign up for news from
Mailchimp Presents

   Enter email address ____________________ (BUTTON)
   You can unsubscribe at any time using the link in our emails. For more
   details, review our privacy policy.
   Visit MailchimpPrivacy & TermsContact usHelp
   ©2001-2019 All Rights Reserved.
   Mailchimp® is a registered trademark of The Rocket Science Group LLC.
   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate
   alternate alternate alternate

   Skip to main content
     * Why Mailchimp?
     * Marketing Platform
          + Illustration of stars and planets Overview
            All the tools you need to market smarter and grow faster.
          + Illustration of a finger tip puppet Audience
               o Marketing CRM
               o Audience Dashboard
               o Tags
               o Segmentation
               o Lookalike Audiences
               o Address Finder
          + Brand
               o Content Studio
               o Templates
          + Layered squares stacked Campaigns
               o Email
               o Social Media
               o Landing Pages
               o Digital Ads
               o Postcards
               o Automations
          + Illustration of a magnifying glass Insights
               o Reports & Analytics
               o Smart Recommendations
               o Integrations
     * Pricing
     * Resources
          + Overview
          + Mailchimp 101
            Everything you need to get started
          + Marketing Tips
            Learn how to master marketing
          + Guides & Tutorials
            Get step-by-step help with Mailchimp
          + MCP - Illustration Mailchimp Presents
            Entertainment made for entrepreneurs

     *
     * Search ____________________ (BUTTON)
     *
     * Log In
     * Sign Up Free
     * Log In
     * Sign Up Free
     *
          + Audience
          + Dashboard
          + Campaigns
          + Reports
          + Account
          + Log In

   (BUTTON)

Flexible plans that grow with you

   Needs change as businesses grow. We’ll help you market smarter from day
   one.
   Illustration of people walking, holding, and climbing on ladders
   (BUTTON) Premium (BUTTON) Standard (BUTTON) Essentials (BUTTON) Free
   [$ USD__]

   CAPTION:

   Table that shows the cost of Mailchimp's four pricing plans and the top
   features available in each: the free plan, the Essential plan starting
   at $9.99 a month, the Standard plan starting at $14.99 a month, and the
   Premium plan starting at $299 a month.
   PLAN
   PLAN
   Premium

   Advanced features for pros who need more customization.
   PLAN
   Mailchimp Recommends
   Standard

   Better insights for growing businesses that want more customers.
   PLAN
   Essentials

   Must-have features for email senders who want added support.
   PLAN
   Free

   All the basics for businesses that are just getting started.
   PRICING
   PRICING
   PRICING
   Starting at
   $
   299
   00
   *
   a month
   Select
   Calculate your price
   PRICING
   PRICING
   Starting at
   $
   14
   99
   *
   a month
   Select
   Calculate your price
   PRICING
   PRICING
   Starting at
   $
   9
   99
   *
   a month
   Select
   Calculate your price
   PRICING
   PRICING
   Starting at
   $
   0
   *
   a month
   Get Started
   TOP FEATURES
   TOP FEATURES
     * TOP FEATURES
     * Everything in Standard, plus:
     * Advanced segmentation
     * Multivariate testing
     * Unlimited seats and role-based access
     * Phone support

   TOP FEATURES
     * TOP FEATURES
     * Everything in Essentials, plus:
     * Automation series
     * Retargeting ads
     * Custom templates
     * Advanced audience insights

   TOP FEATURES
     * TOP FEATURES
     * Everything in Free, plus:
     * All email templates
     * A/B testing
     * Custom branding
     * 24/7 award-winning support

   TOP FEATURES
     * TOP FEATURES
     * 7 marketing channels
     * 1-click automations
     * Basic templates
     * Marketing CRM

   CAPTION:

   Table showing a complete list of services and features that are
   available on each of Mailchimp's four pricing plans.
   Premium
   Standard
   Essentials

   Free

   Marketing CRM

   Contacts

   200,000+ **

   100,000**

   50,000**

   2,000

   Audiences

   Unlimited

   5

   3

   1

   Audience Dashboard

   Tags

   Segmentation

   Contact Profiles

   Predicted Demographics

   Customer Lifetime Value

   Purchase Likelihood

   Lookalike Audience Finder

   Address finder

   Brand & Design

   Content Studio

   Basic Templates

   All Pre-Built Templates

   Remove Mailchimp Footer

   Custom-Coded Templates

   Custom Domains

   $99/year

   $99/year

   $99/year

   $99/year

   Websites (Coming Soon)

   Marketing Channels

   Email

   Landing Pages

   Facebook & Instagram Ads

   Social Posting

   Postcards

   Pop-up Forms

   Retargeting Ads

   Google, Facebook, Instagram

   Automations

   Single-Step Automations

   Welcome email, order notifications, abandoned cart, and more

   Multi-Step Custom Workflows

   Nurture campaigns, onboarding series, and more

   Insights & Optimization

   Basic Reports

   Smart Recommendations

   Send Time Optimization

   Delivery by Time Zone

   A/B Testing

   Multivariate Testing

   Comparative Reporting

   Support

   Knowledge Base

   30 days of Email Support

   24/7 Email & Chat Support

   Phone Support

   Everything else

   Seats

   Unlimited

   5

   3

   1

   Monthly Email Sends

   3M+ **

   1.2M**

   500,000**

   10,000

   Integrations with 200+ Apps

   Mailchimp Mobile App

   **Calculate price based on audience size

   **Calculate price based on audience size

   **Calculate price based on audience size

   PLAN
   Premium
   PLAN
   Standard
   PLAN
   Essentials
   PLAN
   Free
   PRICING
   PRICING
   PRICING
   Starting at
   $
   299
   00
   *
   a month
   Select
   PRICING
   PRICING
   Starting at
   $
   14
   99
   *
   a month
   Select
   PRICING
   PRICING
   Starting at
   $
   9
   99
   *
   a month
   Select
   PRICING
   PRICING
   Starting at
   $
   0
   *
   a month
   Get Started

   Back to top

   *Actual price may vary. Prices displayed are estimates based on current
   exchange rates. Exact amount charged will vary and depends on the
   exchange rate at the time of payment processing. Prices displayed
   exclude any applicable taxes and fees, which will be added to the cost
   of all services purchased. For exact base pricing please refer to
   prices listed in USD.

   *Actual price may vary. Prices displayed are estimates based on the
   USD-GBP exchange rate. Exact amount charged will vary and depends on
   the exchange rate at the time of payment processing. Prices displayed
   exclude VAT, which will be added to the cost of all services purchased.
   For exact pricing please refer to prices listed in USD.

Prefer to pay as you go?

   Instead of paying a monthly recurring charge, you can buy email credits
   as needed through our Pay As You Go plan. It's best for infrequent
   senders.

   Two-factor authentication discount

   At Mailchimp, we’re serious about security. We offer a 10% discount for
   3 months when you add two-factor authentication to your Mailchimp
   account with an app like Google Authenticator or SMS two-factor
   authentication.
   Get started

   Rates for nonprofits and charities

   Mailchimp offers a 15% discount to nonprofits and charities. To request
   the discount, sign up for a free account, and contact our Billing team
   with your username and a link to your organization’s website.
   Get started

FAQs

     *

What payment methods do you offer?
       We accept all major credit cards, PayPal, and (in select countries)
       direct debit. We also support transactions in a range of
       currencies.
     *

How do I switch to a different plan?
       You can switch to a new plan at any time by going to the Billing
       page in your account. Select the plan you’d like to switch to and
       immediately start using new features.
     *

Can I buy credits instead?
       Yes. If you send emails infrequently and prefer to pay as you go,
       you can buy email credits as an alternative to a monthly plan.
       See how it works
     *

Do you have pricing for high-volume email senders?
       We do indeed. If you have more than 200,000 contacts, we have a
       high-volume plan that can meet your needs.
       Contact us for pricing
     *

What happens if I hit my contact or sending limit?
       You can add on a contact block, which includes additional email
       sends, to your plan at any time.

Mailchimp for agencies

   If you’re an agency, you probably want an agency account.
   Get The Details

You’ll be in good company

   East Fork
   Chronicle Books
   Fader
   Sweat
   Magnolia Bakery New York City

Mailchimp Presents

   Illustration of a young, African American girl with her back to us.
   Large eyes are glaring at her in judgement, invoking the sense that she
   does not fit in.

   A collection of short-form series, films, and podcasts created with
   entrepreneurs in mind. Now playing: Outer Monologue, an inspiring new
   animated series from Mailchimp.
   Learn more

Company

     * Our Story
     * Careers
     * Contact
     * Newsroom

Product

     * Email
     * Mobile App
     * Help
     * Developers
     * Status
     * Security
     * What's New

Community

     * Partner Program
     * Experts Directory
     * Integrations Directory
     * Agencies
     * Events
     * Marketing Glossary

     * Facebook
     * Twitter
     * Instagram
     * LinkedIn
     * YouTube

     * [KB]
     * Get it on Google Play

   ©2001-2019 All Rights Reserved. Mailchimp® is a registered trademark of
   The Rocket Science Group. Apple and the Apple logo are trademarks of
   Apple Inc., registered in the U.S. and other countries. Mac App Store
   is a service mark of Apple Inc. Google Play and the Google Play logo
   are trademarks of Google Inc. Privacy & Terms
                            301 Moved Permanently
     __________________________________________________________________

                                    nginx
                            301 Moved Permanently
     __________________________________________________________________

                                    nginx
   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate
   alternate alternate alternate

   Skip to main content
     * Why Mailchimp?
     * Marketing Platform
          + Illustration of stars and planets Overview
            All the tools you need to market smarter and grow faster.
          + Illustration of a finger tip puppet Audience
               o Marketing CRM
               o Audience Dashboard
               o Tags
               o Segmentation
               o Lookalike Audiences
               o Address Finder
          + Brand
               o Content Studio
               o Templates
          + Layered squares stacked Campaigns
               o Email
               o Social Media
               o Landing Pages
               o Digital Ads
               o Postcards
               o Automations
          + Illustration of a magnifying glass Insights
               o Reports & Analytics
               o Smart Recommendations
               o Integrations
     * Pricing
     * Resources
          + Overview
          + Mailchimp 101
            Everything you need to get started
          + Marketing Tips
            Learn how to master marketing
          + Guides & Tutorials
            Get step-by-step help with Mailchimp
          + MCP - Illustration Mailchimp Presents
            Entertainment made for entrepreneurs

     *
     * Search ____________________ (BUTTON)
     *
     * Log In
     * Sign Up Free
     * Log In
     * Sign Up Free
     *
          + Audience
          + Dashboard
          + Campaigns
          + Reports
          + Account
          + Log In

   (BUTTON)

Put your audience at the heart of your marketing

   The more you know about your people, the smarter you can be with your
   campaigns. Our Marketing CRM tools help you turn audience data into
   insights that guide your campaigns—every step of the way.
   Pick A Plan
   A number of human-like characters gather around a fountain, literally
   at the intersection of paths. It's very on the nose.

Know who you’re talking to

   Learn more about your people with data you can understand at a glance.

Do more with audience data

   Turn insights into more targeted messages in just a few clicks.

Build better relationships

   Create deeper connections with your fans—and find new ones.

Get insights, when and where you need them

   We make it easy to get to know your audience (as a whole and as
   individuals) so you can shape campaigns around your people from start
   to finish.

   A man carries various objects that seem to relate to one another. They
   might represent segments and tags, but who can say?

Marketing CRM tools

   Put your customers at the center of everything you do.
   Learn more
   A man, a woman and an excessively friendly-looking cat

Audience dashboard

   Spot patterns in your contact data and use those insights to kick off
   campaigns.
   Learn more
   A smaller person is using a larger person's eyeball as a telescope. It
   sounds gross, but it's actually pretty nicely done.

Contact profiles

   Discover the people behind your data with in-depth, individual
   profiles.
   Learn more

Connect all the dots for more actionable data

   We’ll help you keep track of everything you know about everyone you
   know—so you can confidently act on data in your marketing.

   A hand paints a signup form on an easel. Of all the possible things to
   paint, this person has chosen a signup form. They must really
   understand and appreciate the value that it brings to growing their
   audience. Or maybe they just didn't have a bowl of fruit lying around.

Signup forms

   Use embedded or pop-up forms to collect all the details you need from
   contacts.
   Learn more
   A sun with some mighty ruddy cheeks. A tag hangs from one of its pointy
   parts.

Tags

   Use tags to label and organize contacts however you need to.
   Tags
   Illustration of two people with their hair braided together

Integrations

   Connect all your favorite tools to get a single view of your customer
   data.
   Learn more

   A woman cradles a slice of orange in her arms, while a human-sized
   orange looms behind her, but not in an ominous way.

Pre-built segments

   We’ll create actionable segments within your data for you—just click
   and go.
   Learn more
   A crystal ball swirls while a person in a gingham shirt looks on,
   contented by what they see.

Predicted demographics

   We’ll predict your customers' gender and age range so you know who’s
   buying.
   Learn more
   A woman sails on the high seas, but her boat is, hilariously, a
   postcard.

Address finder

   We'll help find mailing addresses so you can say hi in real life with
   postcards.
   Learn more

Build relationships, old and new

   Use audience data to send targeted marketing to everyone who loves your
   brand—and find new people who are likely to become your next big fans.

   Illustration of two people shaking hands on top of two heads

Personalization

   Add a personal touch to make your marketing feel like a 1-on-1
   conversation.
   Learn more

Automations

   Send the right message to the right people at the right
   moment—automatically.
   Learn more
   Illustration of two turkeys

Lookalike audience finder

   Find new people who are likely to love your brand, based on existing
   contacts.
   Learn more

   IFRAME:
   https://www.youtube-nocookie.com/embed/nXMUugDjdvA?autoplay=0&controls=
   1&fs=1&loop=0&modestbranding=1&playsinline=0&rel=0

     “Ultimately, it’s getting to know our customer. Mailchimp’s tools
     and platform allow us to get closer and understand what they want.”

   Michael Ripps, Co-Owner Jittery Joe's
   See how they do it

See what else you can do

   lllustration that conveys the concept of putting channels together to
   create a campaign that reaches people in different places.

Campaigns

Create better campaigns with Mailchimp

   Create emails, ads, landing pages, and more without ever leaving
   Mailchimp.

   Two gentlemen looking happy in their workspace. Would that we could all
   have their casual camaraderie.

Growing Businesses

Purpose-built for growing businesses

   See how our all-in-one marketing platform empowers your business to
   thrive, even if you’re just beginning.

   Illustration of a person walking

User-Friendly

Multichannel marketing, simplified

   With easy-to-use features and accessible audience insights, you can
   create campaigns that succeed across channels—no design or coding
   skills necessary.

Mailchimp Presents

   Illustration of a young, African American girl with her back to us.
   Large eyes are glaring at her in judgement, invoking the sense that she
   does not fit in.

   A collection of short-form series, films, and podcasts created with
   entrepreneurs in mind. Now playing: Outer Monologue, an inspiring new
   animated series from Mailchimp.
   Learn more

Company

     * Our Story
     * Careers
     * Contact
     * Newsroom

Product

     * Email
     * Mobile App
     * Help
     * Developers
     * Status
     * Security
     * What's New

Community

     * Partner Program
     * Experts Directory
     * Integrations Directory
     * Agencies
     * Events
     * Marketing Glossary

     * Facebook
     * Twitter
     * Instagram
     * LinkedIn
     * YouTube

     * [KB]
     * Get it on Google Play

   ©2001-2019 All Rights Reserved. Mailchimp® is a registered trademark of
   The Rocket Science Group. Apple and the Apple logo are trademarks of
   Apple Inc., registered in the U.S. and other countries. Mac App Store
   is a service mark of Apple Inc. Google Play and the Google Play logo
   are trademarks of Google Inc. Privacy & Terms
   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate
   alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate
   alternate alternate alternate

   Skip to main content
     * Why Mailchimp?
     * Marketing Platform
          + Illustration of stars and planets Overview
            All the tools you need to market smarter and grow faster.
          + Illustration of a finger tip puppet Audience
               o Marketing CRM
               o Audience Dashboard
               o Tags
               o Segmentation
               o Lookalike Audiences
               o Address Finder
          + Brand
               o Content Studio
               o Templates
          + Layered squares stacked Campaigns
               o Email
               o Social Media
               o Landing Pages
               o Digital Ads
               o Postcards
               o Automations
          + Illustration of a magnifying glass Insights
               o Reports & Analytics
               o Smart Recommendations
               o Integrations
     * Pricing
     * Resources
          + Overview
          + Mailchimp 101
            Everything you need to get started
          + Marketing Tips
            Learn how to master marketing
          + Guides & Tutorials
            Get step-by-step help with Mailchimp
          + MCP - Illustration Mailchimp Presents
            Entertainment made for entrepreneurs

     *
     * Search ____________________ (BUTTON)
     *
     * Log In
     * Sign Up Free
     * Log In
     * Sign Up Free
     *
          + Audience
          + Dashboard
          + Campaigns
          + Reports
          + Account
          + Log In

   (BUTTON)

   Search Mailchimp ____________________ (BUTTON)

   Filter by type
     * All
     * Articles
     * Developer Documentation
     * Features
     * Tutorials
     * Experts
     * Integrations

   Filter by type
   [All____________________]
   Read this page in
   [English____________]
   2026 results

   2026 results
   Read this page in
   [English____________]

Mailchimp 101: Everything You Need to Get Started

   https://mailchimp.com/resources/mailchimp-101/

   New to Mailchimp? We’ll walk you through the basics so you know what to
   expect and how to get started.

Pricing

   https://mailchimp.com/pricing/

   Needs change as businesses grow. We’ll help you market smarter from day
   one.

Mailchimp Postcards - Design, Print, and Mail

   https://mailchimp.com/features/postcards/

   From design to send, you can manage your postcards alongside all your
   other marketing in Mailchimp. Create your design, choose who you want
   to reach, and we’ll send your postcard on your behalf. We’ve put a
   modern twist on a classic marketing channel. (Think of it as email for
   mailboxes.)

Free Landing Page Builder

   https://mailchimp.com/features/landing-pages/

   Give people a clear call to action to join your list or buy your
   products. Our drag-and-drop editor makes it easy to build a page in
   minutes.

Abandoned Cart Emails Help Recapture Sales

   https://mailchimp.com/features/abandoned-cart/

   Bring shoppers back to their carts—and get an average of 34 times more
   orders than bulk email alone.

Email Marketing Strategy and Tips for Successful Campaigns - Mailchimp

   https://mailchimp.com/email-marketing/

   Email marketing helps you interact with your audience while promoting
   your brand and increasing sales. Here are some important do's and
   don'ts that will help you connect with your customers: One big question
   everyone new to email marketing has is whether it's OK to buy lists
   from third parties. The

How Mailchimp Can Help Your Online Store

   https://mailchimp.com/help/how-mailchimp-can-help-your-online-store/

   Mailchimp’s e-commerce tools help you grow your business and sell more
   stuff. Find new audiences, promote your products, boost customer
   loyalty, and track your sales.

Getting Started with Tags

   https://mailchimp.com/help/getting-started-tags/

   Tags are labels you create to help organize your contacts in Mailchimp.
   Learn how to use tags, where to find them, and how to get started.

Social Media Intern, Summer 2020

   https://mailchimp.com/jobs/listings/1876577-social-media-intern-summer-
   2020/

   The Mailchimp internship program started in 2013. In the past 7 years,
   we’ve had the privilege of bringing in some of the brightest, most
   talented college students from around the country to spend time with
   our teams. Our 12 week intern program was designed so that interns can
   grow their skill set,

All the Merge Tags Cheat Sheet

   https://mailchimp.com/help/all-the-merge-tags-cheat-sheet/

   Merge tags let you insert dynamic content in your campaigns. Get a list
   containing each merge tag and how to use it.

About Mailchimp Pricing Plans

   https://mailchimp.com/help/about-mailchimp-pricing-plans/

   Whether you're starting out or already have a large number of contacts,
   we have a pricing option for you. Learn about Mailchimp's pricing
   plans, features, and add-ons.

Format Guidelines for Your Import File

   https://mailchimp.com/help/format-guidelines-for-your-import-file/

   Certain audience field types, like addresses and phone numbers, require
   a specific format. Learn about field types, and how to format them to
   work with Mailchimp.
     __________________________________________________________________

   1234…169
   Next →

Mailchimp Presents

   Illustration of a young, African American girl with her back to us.
   Large eyes are glaring at her in judgement, invoking the sense that she
   does not fit in.

   A collection of short-form series, films, and podcasts created with
   entrepreneurs in mind. Now playing: Outer Monologue, an inspiring new
   animated series from Mailchimp.
   Learn more

Company

     * Our Story
     * Careers
     * Contact
     * Newsroom

Product

     * Email
     * Mobile App
     * Help
     * Developers
     * Status
     * Security
     * What's New

Community

     * Partner Program
     * Experts Directory
     * Integrations Directory
     * Agencies
     * Events
     * Marketing Glossary

     * Facebook
     * Twitter
     * Instagram
     * LinkedIn
     * YouTube

     * [KB]
     * Get it on Google Play

   ©2001-2019 All Rights Reserved. Mailchimp® is a registered trademark of
   The Rocket Science Group. Apple and the Apple logo are trademarks of
   Apple Inc., registered in the U.S. and other countries. Mac App Store
   is a service mark of Apple Inc. Google Play and the Google Play logo
   are trademarks of Google Inc. Privacy & Terms
   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate
   alternate alternate alternate

   Skip to main content
     * Why Mailchimp?
     * Marketing Platform
          + Illustration of stars and planets Overview
            All the tools you need to market smarter and grow faster.
          + Illustration of a finger tip puppet Audience
               o Marketing CRM
               o Audience Dashboard
               o Tags
               o Segmentation
               o Lookalike Audiences
               o Address Finder
          + Brand
               o Content Studio
               o Templates
          + Layered squares stacked Campaigns
               o Email
               o Social Media
               o Landing Pages
               o Digital Ads
               o Postcards
               o Automations
          + Illustration of a magnifying glass Insights
               o Reports & Analytics
               o Smart Recommendations
               o Integrations
     * Pricing
     * Resources
          + Overview
          + Mailchimp 101
            Everything you need to get started
          + Marketing Tips
            Learn how to master marketing
          + Guides & Tutorials
            Get step-by-step help with Mailchimp
          + MCP - Illustration Mailchimp Presents
            Entertainment made for entrepreneurs

     *
     * Search ____________________ (BUTTON)
     *
     * Log In
     * Sign Up Free
     * Log In
     * Sign Up Free
     *
          + Audience
          + Dashboard
          + Campaigns
          + Reports
          + Account
          + Log In

   (BUTTON)

Marketing CRM

Build better relationships with your customers

   Get to know your audience and find new ways to market to them when you
   use Mailchimp for customer relationship management (CRM).
   Pick A Plan
   Illustration of people looking at art

Start putting your data to work

01

Connect all your contact data

   Bring all your audience data into Mailchimp to start using ready-made
   segments.

02

Organize what you know

   Create your own segments and tags to filter audience data however you
   need to.

03

Understand patterns in your data

   Get to know your audience at a glance with your audience dashboard.

04

Turn audience insights into action

   Set up automated messages to trigger based on specific segments or
   tags.

Get a holistic view of your audience

   Whether you’re starting from scratch with CRM or bringing an existing
   audience into Mailchimp, connecting your store and keeping all your
   contact data in Mailchimp helps you stay organized and improve your
   marketing. Best of all, our audience dashboard will help you get to
   know your audience at a glance, visually showing you segments within
   your audience data that you can send targeted campaigns to with just a
   few clicks.

Organize your contacts however you need to

   With all your contact data in one place, it’s easy to use Mailchimp’s
   segmentation tools to find exactly who you need to talk to. Segments,
   tags, and groups work in slightly different ways to help you create
   your own organizational structure and keep track of everything you
   learn about contacts as you grow.

Get insights about how to talk to your audience

   Mailchimp makes it easy to gain insights about your audience—from a
   bird's eye view or at an individual level. Our growth, engagement, and
   revenue reports will help you discover patterns in audience behavior
   and see what’s working with your marketing. Contact profiles let you
   meet the people behind the numbers, so you can dive in and see what
   actions have led to a purchase, leave notes about individual
   preferences, and more.

Build a personalized experience for every customer

   Once you’ve organized your customer data, you can start using those
   insights to make sure your marketing speaks to individual customers
   across marketing channels. Use Mailchimp’s personalization and
   automation tools to make campaigns feel like a 1-on-1
   conversation—sending the right message at the right moment, and always
   making the right product recommendations.

   UI showing clicking into a segment of the audience dashboard to send a
   campaign

Understand customer data and act on it—all in one dashboard

   Our audience dashboard shows you pre-built segments like top locations,
   recent sources of growth, common tags, and even customer lifetime value
   (CLV).
   See how it works

   Animated gif of a microscopic view of your customers

How to manage your audience in Mailchimp

   See how our Marketing CRM tools help you get a clearer picture of who
   your audience is and how to keep them engaged.
   Read the article

   IFRAME:
   https://www.youtube-nocookie.com/embed/qxL4pqyYxl0?autoplay=0&controls=
   1&fs=1&loop=0&modestbranding=1&playsinline=0&rel=0

     “As we continue to segment and test our campaigns, we are seeing our
     revenue and engagement increase with our customers.”

   Daisy Downs, Co-Founder and Vice President of Marketing UrbanSitter
   See how they market smarter with CRM tools

Need to connect your enterprise CRM? We’ve got you covered.

     * Mailchimp for Salesforce
     * Mailchimp and other CRMs
     * Mailchimp integrations directory

Start using audience data to improve your marketing

   Mailchimp gives you the tools you need to build better customer
   relationships at scale.
   Sign Up

See more ways to get targeted with your marketing

   Illustration of a guy getting a piece of bread

Targeting 101: A Beginner's Guide to Segmentation

   The hardest thing about ‘segmentation’ is the term itself—learn how to
   get started.

   Illustration of a bunch of faces

Keep, Archive, or Delete? Top Tips for Managing Your Contacts

   3 ways to make sure you’re getting the most value from an audience
   you’ve worked hard to build.

   Illustration of a garden

4 Simple Steps to Turn Customer Data into Targeted Campaigns That Sell More
Stuff

   How to use customer data—from email engagement to purchase history—to
   send more targeted campaigns in Mailchimp.

Mailchimp Presents

   Illustration of a young, African American girl with her back to us.
   Large eyes are glaring at her in judgement, invoking the sense that she
   does not fit in.

   A collection of short-form series, films, and podcasts created with
   entrepreneurs in mind. Now playing: Outer Monologue, an inspiring new
   animated series from Mailchimp.
   Learn more

Company

     * Our Story
     * Careers
     * Contact
     * Newsroom

Product

     * Email
     * Mobile App
     * Help
     * Developers
     * Status
     * Security
     * What's New

Community

     * Partner Program
     * Experts Directory
     * Integrations Directory
     * Agencies
     * Events
     * Marketing Glossary

     * Facebook
     * Twitter
     * Instagram
     * LinkedIn
     * YouTube

     * [KB]
     * Get it on Google Play

   ©2001-2019 All Rights Reserved. Mailchimp® is a registered trademark of
   The Rocket Science Group. Apple and the Apple logo are trademarks of
   Apple Inc., registered in the U.S. and other countries. Mac App Store
   is a service mark of Apple Inc. Google Play and the Google Play logo
   are trademarks of Google Inc. Privacy & Terms
   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate
   alternate alternate alternate

   Skip to main content
     * Why Mailchimp?
     * Marketing Platform
          + Illustration of stars and planets Overview
            All the tools you need to market smarter and grow faster.
          + Illustration of a finger tip puppet Audience
               o Marketing CRM
               o Audience Dashboard
               o Tags
               o Segmentation
               o Lookalike Audiences
               o Address Finder
          + Brand
               o Content Studio
               o Templates
          + Layered squares stacked Campaigns
               o Email
               o Social Media
               o Landing Pages
               o Digital Ads
               o Postcards
               o Automations
          + Illustration of a magnifying glass Insights
               o Reports & Analytics
               o Smart Recommendations
               o Integrations
     * Pricing
     * Resources
          + Overview
          + Mailchimp 101
            Everything you need to get started
          + Marketing Tips
            Learn how to master marketing
          + Guides & Tutorials
            Get step-by-step help with Mailchimp
          + MCP - Illustration Mailchimp Presents
            Entertainment made for entrepreneurs

     *
     * Search ____________________ (BUTTON)
     *
     * Log In
     * Sign Up Free
     * Log In
     * Sign Up Free
     *
          + Audience
          + Dashboard
          + Campaigns
          + Reports
          + Account
          + Log In

   (BUTTON)

Audience Dashboard

Smarter marketing starts with knowing your people

   Our audience dashboard gives you the tools you need to understand
   contact data and act on it—all in one place.
   Go To Your Dashboard
   Illustration of people

   UI showing clicking into a segment of the audience dashboard to send a
   campaign

Insights you can act on—instantly

   This isn’t your average dashboard. Every section is clickable, so you
   can instantly launch campaigns based on what you learn from your data.
   And when you start every campaign with your contacts’ interests in
   mind, it’s easier to create marketing that matters to your people.

   Abstract UI showing new contacts within the audience dashboard

Stay focused on your people as you grow

   Your contact data is one of the most important tools you have as a
   marketer, and when you store it in Mailchimp, your audience dashboard
   will help you understand it holistically. Spot patterns in your data at
   a glance, keep tabs on trends, and always know who you’re talking
   to—even as your audience evolves.

   Photograph showing Mailchimp customer Blabla kids in their store

Blabla kids connected with an audience they didn’t know was there.

   The independent toy line thought they knew who was buying their
   products, but the data told a different story—and helped them reach new
   customers with more targeted messages.
   See how they did it

Pre-built segments you can target with a click

   When you know who you’re talking to, you know what to say. We’ll get
   you started with a few pre-built segments, right in your dashboard.

   Illustration of person looking at a list of spots

Growth sources

   Find out where your newest contacts came from.
   Illustration of tag on a sun with a face on it

Tags

   Easily target messages to contacts based on your tags.
   Illustration of globe

Top locations

   Find out where your contacts are located.
   Illustration of an envelope

Email engagement

   Reach out to people based on how they interact with your emails.

   illustration of a shopping cart with a plant

See your most valuable customers at a glance

   If you have a paid account with a connected store and purchase data,
   your audience dashboard will also show an estimate of your customers’
   lifetime value (CLV) and their likelihood to purchase again.

   We use predictive modeling to learn from your purchase data and create
   segments of customers based on how likely they are to purchase from you
   again, and how much they’re likely to spend in your store in the
   future—so you can use these insights to reward VIPs, or bring
   occasional buyers back.

Looking for more ways to make the most of your audience? We can help.

     * How to Manage Your Audience in Mailchimp
     * Targeting 101: A Beginner’s Guide to Segmentation
     * Keep, Archive, or Delete? Top Tips for Managing Contacts in
       Mailchimp
     * 4 Simple Steps to Turn Customer Data into Targeted Campaigns That
       Sell More Stuff

Start turning audience data into targeted marketing

   Sign Up

See what else you can do with your audience data

Tags & Custom fields

Unlock better targeting when you organize your contacts in Mailchimp

   With all your contact insights organized in Mailchimp, it’s easy to
   send messages that matter.

   Two chicken friends.

Lookalike Audience Finder

Find new people with the help of your best customers

   Send a postcard and let Mailchimp help you reach new people who are
   sure to love you.

Personalization

Give your customers what they really want

   Mailchimp’s personalization tools give you the keys to unlock valuable
   customer insights and use them to send the right message at the right
   moment.

Mailchimp Presents

   Illustration of a young, African American girl with her back to us.
   Large eyes are glaring at her in judgement, invoking the sense that she
   does not fit in.

   A collection of short-form series, films, and podcasts created with
   entrepreneurs in mind. Now playing: Outer Monologue, an inspiring new
   animated series from Mailchimp.
   Learn more

Company

     * Our Story
     * Careers
     * Contact
     * Newsroom

Product

     * Email
     * Mobile App
     * Help
     * Developers
     * Status
     * Security
     * What's New

Community

     * Partner Program
     * Experts Directory
     * Integrations Directory
     * Agencies
     * Events
     * Marketing Glossary

     * Facebook
     * Twitter
     * Instagram
     * LinkedIn
     * YouTube

     * [KB]
     * Get it on Google Play

   ©2001-2019 All Rights Reserved. Mailchimp® is a registered trademark of
   The Rocket Science Group. Apple and the Apple logo are trademarks of
   Apple Inc., registered in the U.S. and other countries. Mac App Store
   is a service mark of Apple Inc. Google Play and the Google Play logo
   are trademarks of Google Inc. Privacy & Terms
   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate
   alternate alternate alternate

   Skip to main content
     * Why Mailchimp?
     * Marketing Platform
          + Illustration of stars and planets Overview
            All the tools you need to market smarter and grow faster.
          + Illustration of a finger tip puppet Audience
               o Marketing CRM
               o Audience Dashboard
               o Tags
               o Segmentation
               o Lookalike Audiences
               o Address Finder
          + Brand
               o Content Studio
               o Templates
          + Layered squares stacked Campaigns
               o Email
               o Social Media
               o Landing Pages
               o Digital Ads
               o Postcards
               o Automations
          + Illustration of a magnifying glass Insights
               o Reports & Analytics
               o Smart Recommendations
               o Integrations
     * Pricing
     * Resources
          + Overview
          + Mailchimp 101
            Everything you need to get started
          + Marketing Tips
            Learn how to master marketing
          + Guides & Tutorials
            Get step-by-step help with Mailchimp
          + MCP - Illustration Mailchimp Presents
            Entertainment made for entrepreneurs

     *
     * Search ____________________ (BUTTON)
     *
     * Log In
     * Sign Up Free
     * Log In
     * Sign Up Free
     *
          + Audience
          + Dashboard
          + Campaigns
          + Reports
          + Account
          + Log In

   (BUTTON)

Tags & Custom Fields

Unlock better targeting when you bring custom contact data into Mailchimp

   With all your contact insights organized in Mailchimp, it’s easy to
   send messages that matter.
   Pick A Plan

Organize contacts however you need to with tags

   Tags are customizable labels you create for your contacts based on
   what’s important for you to know. While Mailchimp comes with lots of
   built-in ways to search within your audience data, tags let you add
   insights unique to your needs—then use them to create segments.

   Best of all, they’re completely flexible: easily stay organized when
   you tag multiple contacts on import, or even add tags automatically
   based on the specific landing page they signed up on.

Save time by sending to tags in a click—or even automatically

   Once you start tagging contacts, you’ll see your most commonly used
   tags on your audience dashboard, so you can start sending targeted
   campaigns to these segments with just a few clicks. You can even
   trigger automations based on tags, to instantly follow up with a
   targeted message as soon as a tag is applied.

Let people tell you what they want to hear from you

   By adding customized fields to your Mailchimp signup forms, you can let
   your contacts tell you about their preferences, and organize contacts
   based on specific interest groups within your audience.

   Then you can easily send them targeted messages based on what you find
   out, or even trigger automated messages to people based on their
   selections.

Use your unique insights to drive better segmentation

   As you bring custom insights into Mailchimp, they’ll also be added as
   filtering options for building segments—so you can use a combination of
   tags, custom form fields, and a number of other filters to find exactly
   who you want to talk to as your audience grows.

   IFRAME:
   https://www.youtube-nocookie.com/embed/LOcdtVYXUOM?autoplay=0&controls=
   1&fs=1&loop=0&modestbranding=1&playsinline=0&rel=0

     "We're using tags to organize our audience depending on what they've
     done and how they interact with us. I’m a marketing department of
     one, so having an easy method to segment our audience is essential."

   Terry Conway, Marketing and Communications Director World Arts West
   See how they do it

Add your own customized insights

   If your business has an app or connected store, you can use our API to
   automatically create tags in Mailchimp based on interests and
   attributes—so you can quickly take action on these insights in your
   marketing.
   See the developer guide

Integrate tags across tools

Looking for more tips on how to target your marketing? We have you covered.

     * Getting Started with Tags
     * Manage Tags
     * Send to Tags

It’s easy to get started.

   And it’s free. Two things everyone loves.
   Sign Up

See more tips for managing your audience your audience in Mailchimp

   Illustration of a person viewing some flowers with a magnifying glass

How to Manage Your Audience in Mailchimp

   Get organized and put your customer data to work when you use Mailchimp
   for CRM.

   Illustration of a guy getting a piece of bread

Targeting 101: A Beginner's Guide to Segmentation

   The hardest thing about ‘segmentation’ is the term itself—learn how to
   get started.

   Illustration of a garden

4 Simple Steps to Turn Customer Data into Targeted Campaigns That Sell More
Stuff

   How to use customer data—from email engagement to purchase history—to
   send more targeted campaigns in Mailchimp.

Mailchimp Presents

   Illustration of a young, African American girl with her back to us.
   Large eyes are glaring at her in judgement, invoking the sense that she
   does not fit in.

   A collection of short-form series, films, and podcasts created with
   entrepreneurs in mind. Now playing: Outer Monologue, an inspiring new
   animated series from Mailchimp.
   Learn more

Company

     * Our Story
     * Careers
     * Contact
     * Newsroom

Product

     * Email
     * Mobile App
     * Help
     * Developers
     * Status
     * Security
     * What's New

Community

     * Partner Program
     * Experts Directory
     * Integrations Directory
     * Agencies
     * Events
     * Marketing Glossary

     * Facebook
     * Twitter
     * Instagram
     * LinkedIn
     * YouTube

     * [KB]
     * Get it on Google Play

   ©2001-2019 All Rights Reserved. Mailchimp® is a registered trademark of
   The Rocket Science Group. Apple and the Apple logo are trademarks of
   Apple Inc., registered in the U.S. and other countries. Mac App Store
   is a service mark of Apple Inc. Google Play and the Google Play logo
   are trademarks of Google Inc. Privacy & Terms
